Connor stared out the windshield as his friend found the only open space left in the tiny lot. “She brought up my old man. Said he’d be disappointed in me.” His head sunk as he stared into his lap, fighting tears again. He didn’t want Taylor to see him cry any more than Miss Flint.
The old Rose in the movie was telling her story and this is a line that I am planning to make a sampler with as soon as I get unpacked and rested.
It’s always good to take tree nuts and seeds to snack on the plane too. Any fruit or raw veggie you can take as well.
6. Angelica
The Japanese DVD does not include English subtitles, as is now (unfortunately) becoming the norm for releases of this type. Indeed, this DVD lacks even Japanese subtitles.
How to Flirt with a Naked Werewolf by Molly Harper
As I pour out, He pours in. I realize that being quiet in His presence is almost a lost art that needs a revival. When we quiet ourselves before Him, He is able to completely fill us in exchange for what is weighing us down. He uses His presence, and His Word to breathe life into us, and we need so very much more than we realize.
Calling Your Mother “Woman”
#135 iMapMyRun iPhone App
Though left behind was one
Les McKeown – Vocals
IT WAS ZIGGY!!!!
like it did our grandparents
Your observations on why meetings so often go wrong would also be appreciated!
And it was just about then, when I was spilling the beans about my special friend, that Mister Rogers rose from his corner of the couch and stood suddenly in front of me with a small black camera in hand. “Can I take your picture, Tom?” he asked. “I’d like to take your picture. I like to take pictures of all my new friends, so that I can show them to Joanne …. “And then, in the dark room, there was a wallop of white light, and Mister Rogers disappeared behind it.
If you are a Fiskateer, Sandy has a RAK she is giving out for those who are voting. If you pass this on, she will give you more entries!! (I am not entering the RAK)
I rend, I end, I return.
1 lb short cut pasta
which thanks to Bro. Kerry makes so much more sense now.
For the past couple of weeks, I've noticed I'm not the only one with a routine.
Turns out sweet, innocent June might just be the perfect foil for psycho beyotch Chloe. When June displays unexpected strength in the face of Chloe’s antics, the two form an unlikely alliance. The pilot started out with June’s life being turned down in some hilarious ways from walking into her dream job on Wall Street only to find the firm going to hell and the feds shutting the place down to her getting scammed by none other than her new roomie Chloe. Poor thing even finds out that her fiancee is a no good cheater… not a great start for June bug there. But there is a quiet strength to be found in her character, she is very endearing in a way that you can tell she has some fight in her underneath all that Midwest charm, and under Chloe’s guidance, she might just find her bite. Not nearly as entertaining as her cohorts however, June needs to find her footing somewhere in this show, because at times she gets lots in the crazy antics of her costars. But aside from that, Dreama Walker brings a sweet charm to the show that represents the genuine good and hopefulness of this small town girl who sets her eyes on the big city. She is smart and isn’t about to let Chloe have her way… making the two a fun pair, merging good and evil to create a hilarious result.
After you have evaluated a house the normal way, you should repeat the exact same process on the house in relation to the Moon. Lets say for example you want to evaluate the fifth house of a chart where Pisces rises and the Moon is in Aquarius. The 5th sign from Pisces is… (Aries is 2, Taurus 3, Gemini 4, Cancer 5) …Cancer, so you do this whole system on Cancer, like I just described. Then, when you are done, you examine the 5th House from the Moon. In this case the Moon is in Aquarius, so the fifth house from the moon is… (Pisces is 2, Aries 3, Taurus 4, Gemini 5) …Gemini. So you repeat the process now focusing on Gemini.
- My modem didn't work on it, so I had to go buy a Vista friendly one just to get back on the net.
Another favorite story, which didn't happen all that long ago either, is when an author received several emails from Italian fans who loved her work but were complaining about the poor translation.
and wish
Suddenly, all the accomplishments of the Boers became 'Afrikaner' accomplishments.
As I said, it's difficult to tell if the film's numerous other fans see in it the same things that I do. More than most films, it's difficult to talk about Certified Copy because it seems to be speaking a language all its own, one in which none of us are exactly fluent. We can start by saying that the film is sublimely beautiful in a way that few films are, though "mere" beauty can seem inadequate for some. But it also affirms the need for beauty, and isn't the creation of a work of art so wholly beautiful as Certified Copy itself the most adequate response to a world that is often ugly?
£850
Dustin always teases me because I really want to avoid making the baby have a December birthday so that is when it is going to happen, the baby will be born on the 25th. We will just wait and see and jump for joy when it happens!
Celebrities with a Diamond face: Linda Evangelista and Madonna.
Bodie, a labradoodle, belongs to Courtney and will be two in December (they grow up so fast). He hails from Goldsboro, NC. Bodie is a loving boy who is obsessed with balls, frisbees, and anything that he can retrieve. He absolutely loves swimming, dock diving, and has recently fallen in love with golf and baseball (well, retrieving the balls for the sport)!
Just thought I’d have a bit of a whinge and at the same time explain why there has been a sparsity of posts. Work has increased due to targets and ‘call connect’ so that when I walk into the station the first job is given bang on the hour (there are always emergencies outstanding at the start and end of shifts which I’ll explain why in a bit).
Last Friday I headed over to the Harvard Med School (HMS) to listen to the final presentations of the students involved in HMS's Native American High School Summer Program. I was so blown away and impressed by the students and what they managed to accomplish in three weeks, their presentations were incredible, powerful, and moving.
I compared Cle de Peau to MAC Pro Longwear which is what I normally use. You can see Cle de Peau gives a bit more coverage than the MAC concealer.
TV host: 70,000 fatwas were issued by Dar Al-Iftaa. What’s the problem with this fatwa?
An op-ed they published on the back page of today's national edition would suggest this to be the case:
accustomed to night
2. We find encouragement and accountability.
The author of this story is in fact Lisa Morrison, and not Noel Blake as listed in the print addition. The publishers regret this error.
Spin-doctors went into over-drive after the event to highlight the alleged violence against policemen and their property. The oldest trick in the book, employed for centuries by police and law enforcement agencies globally, when trying to control crowds in large rallies, marches, etc is to use police operatives in plain or unidentified clothes to work as agent provocateurs to start trouble. Unless an independent, credible organisation reviews all the evidence, and makes a finding that the Bersih marchers were actually responsible for causing violence, I am not prepared to accept the police version. In any event, one must also consider their provocation and intimidation that resulted in such behaviour. The entire context must be taken into account.
Upon rising in the morning, I couldn’t contain my squeals of delight.
According to senior enforcement sources and documents reviewed by the IPT, investigators had information tying Abdul Mawgoud Dardery to the pornography investigation that was based in Pennsylvania. He was the senior member in the four-person FJP delegation which held court with academic groups and met with senior officials at the White House and State Department last week.
During the semester we all had to review, critique and respond to a classmates, notes, completed project or class assignment. I was able to get a lot of experience with building relationships with others to pose and solve problems collaboratively and cross culturally by completing the peer reviews. We were required to do peer reviews and responses of other classmates reading and reflecting notes. I felt as if this task helped me to learn about a chapter that I would not have otherwise looked at. Doing this also provided me with different perspectives and ways of interpreting information. The greatest benefit that I obtained from reviewing and responding to others is I was able to apply what I had read to particular concepts with homework and projects. The project that I benefited from the most from peer reviews is the photo project. I was able to get other opinions on how to edit my project to make it better. I was also able to apply Chapter 5: Next Steps from New Media Design (Austin, Tricia & Doust (2007) because that chapter discussed having to collaborate and work with others to reach a common goal as part of a skill and requirement for work in new media. Working as an editor would require me to work with a group as well as collaborate with a senior editor. For the future I would like to be able to provide a more in-depth feedback for my peers so that I can help them the same way they helped me.
But were it not for the revolutionary forces led by General Israel Putnam showing heart against the British on Breed’s Hill, Americans might not be eating New England clam chowder each June 17.
Switchboard: (020) 7210 3000 (GTN 210) Direct Line: (020) 7210 3270
Knowledge is enlightening, yet utilizing and executing that knowledge is power. Let me know if any of the above stuff wouldn’t help you and your salespeople transform into the elite team you’ve always desired it to become.
The room came roaring back in a blurry swirl. The man held his gun pointed to the ceiling. He looked smug, almost proud.
"Super Why is pretend, too," I inserted, and they both looked at me in amazement.
This is far from the case. Compared to the pageant of homophobic and misogynist pants-wetting going on on the American right, all the Democrats need to do to make themselves look like a sane and useful political outfit is to sit back and watch the Republicans engage in
Regarding River Benue, one
Maybe both of us are dreaming?
AS you can see, I had heard of goldwork, and translated this into SHINY!!!! SHINY!!!SHINY!!! I think it’s all satin and back stitches.
Traveling through the sculpture in a spiral continuum. Getting to the center is not the goal or the accomplishment, but rather the pliant observation, an activity of looking. Movement is fundamental to this art piece, and while the walls are unpredictable, unfathomable in one viewing. This is the key component of experience.
Now females, here’s the bottom line: Males do things to impress you. Full Stop. End transmission. Done.
2) People: members, customers, SGA (student government association), chef, friends, donors, and partnership.
We are intimidated to say ‘No’. We want to be liked. We want to respect other’s differences in opinions, feelings, beliefs or perceptions. We want to uphold their ‘God given’ or democratically granted rights and freedoms. We jump through hoops trying to be ‘fair’ towards the person we are saying ‘No’ to. Even though ‘No’ is the proper response, we are loath to say it.
I read an article recently that said you should create this kind of collage and then hide it away and only then will the good things come to you because you are not thinking about it.
I’ve said it before. I admire the honest, hard working and noble individuals still doing their best, endangering their lives on a daily basis, to provide effective policing in South Africa.
Another downside of using expired film… I took 24 pictures but only 17 of them were able to be developed. Granted, some of this was probably me STILL trying to shoot pictures inside. But now I am stuck never knowing what those 8 pictures were and what they would have looked like.
The sun is a near-perfect sphere, with an oblateness of about 9 millionths, for those of you who care about oblateness. About three-quarters of its mass consists of hydrogen, with the rest being mostly helium. It exists in a plasmatic state rather than being a solid, so you couldn’t walk on its “surface” even if you had really thick soles on your shoes. Its color is white, although from the earth it may appear yellow because of atmospheric scattering.
Ben looked at the others. They wore faces of indifference. Then he walked towards the last ticket machine, the fourth in the line. It looked just like all the others, patiently waiting for a customer to purchase a ticket. Lights lit, ready to deliver a journey on a small orange piece of card.
It reminded me of something. Oh ya, the observer side of myself watching my workhorse self struggle through her writing... or not writing, as the case may be.
Bateman are going crazy with him.
We can achieve healthy community, Wuellner suggests, through communal prayer:
Birth Month Traits:
So if you get a pad of 24 sheets for 1/2 off (now you've spent about $4.50), times 6 squares in each, you will have 144 decent sized squares to work with. This will last quite a while for most families.
Here's why their story is in the paper today. We cannot allow such callousness to continue unremarked, from the irrational, senseless teenagers who attacked two people just trying to go home, from the police officer whose conduct may have been typical but certainly seems cold, from the tweeting nitwits who think beating a man in Norfolk will change the death of Trayvon Martin.
Much of the derision aimed at Mandingo comes from a belief that what it depicts is so outrageous that it cannot be true, it must be comedy. Certainly, the performances, particularly those of James Mason and Susan George, are over-the-top – in the case of the latter so much so that it often veers into camp – but I think Fleischer knows exactly what he is doing. Throughout the film there are acts of racism so unfathomable to a modern audience that they appear totally absurd: to cure his rheumatism, Papa Maxwell places a young slave boy at his feet while in bed, pushing against the boy’s the stomach in order to flush the pain out of his own body and into his; the same boy is seen time and time again lying flat on the ground while Maxwell uses him as a foot stool; Mede is forced to toughen his skin before a big fight by sitting in that aforementioned cauldron of hot water; etc. To see these images is a surreal experience, but that does not mean they did not occur. Moreover, whether or not the specific offenses that the film depicts actually took place is not really the issue; I have no doubt that if they did not, something equally horrible, if not more so, did. If there is anything the history of humanity has taught us, it is that there is no end to the sadistic imagination. The audience I watched the film with chuckled throughout, whether it be at the sight of the boy absorbing rheumatism or a line like, “Niggers don’t feel pain as fast as white folks.” I don’t believe this laughter comes from any sort of innate racism or lack of compassion toward the slaves, but rather from a lack of any sort of apparatus with which to understand how something like this could have occurred. We are taught in schools and through cultural osmosis that the slaves were whipped and forced to do backbreaking work, but the extent to which they were simply used as sub-human property – to breed, to fight, to fuck – the exceedingly intimate way blacks and whites constantly interacted as abuser and abused, is (hopefully) not something a modern mind can comprehend. So, we laugh. Fleischer understands this and purposely heightens the already extreme offerings that much further, pushing the idea that a society that can do these things is indeed absurd. There are several small, throwaway scenes and images that highlight the underlying surrealism of what we are seeing, most memorably for me a quick tracking shot of a group of chained slaves marching in line with two slaves in front playing Yankee Doodle on a fiddle and waving a giant American flag to keep time. In this context, the performances of Mason and George, who play the two most virulently racist characters in the film, are exactly as they should be, highlighting the bewildering absurdity that slavery and racism require to thrive.
“Of course – I wouldn’t expect anything less,” Craig returned.
Governor Thomas Dorr 1844, convicted of treason against the state of Rhode Island; see Dorr Rebellion; released in 1845; civil rights restored in 1851; verdict annulled in 1854. John Brown, convicted of treason against the Commonwealth of Virginia in 1859 and executed for attempting to organize armed resistance to slavery. Aaron Dwight Stevens, took part in John Brown's raid and was executed in 1860 for treason against Virginia. William Bruce Mumford, convicted of treason and hanged in 1862 for tearing down a United States flag during the American Civil War. Mary Surratt, Lewis Powell, David Herold, and George Atzerodt, all hanged on July 7, 1865 for treason and conspiracy for the Lincoln assassination and conspiracy - by military tribunal. Iva Toguri D'Aquino, who is frequently identified with "Tokyo Rose" convicted 1949. Subsequently pardoned by President Gerald Ford. Herbert Hans Haupt, German-born naturalized U.S. citizen, was convicted of treason in 1942 and executed after being named as a German spy by fellow German spies defecting to the United States. Martin James Monti, United States Army Air Force pilot, convicted of treason for defecting to the Waffen SS in 1944. Robert Henry Best, convicted of treason on April 16, 1948 and served a life sentence. Mildred Gillars, also known as "Axis Sally", convicted of treason on March 8, 1949; served 12 years of a 10- to 30-year prison sentence. Tomoya Kawakita, sentenced to death for treason in 1952, but eventually released by President John F. Kennedy to be deported to Japan. Adam Yahiye Gadahn has been indicted for treason as of 2012, but has not been brought to trial as he remains at large. Examining each case is a little more than I care to take on in this post, but let's at least look at the most recent, Mr. Gadahn, and a couple of the others that, at first glance, seem like they take us beyond the obvious (spying for Nazis, the Soviets, or participanting in rebellion) and see if they get us close to the sorts of activities that we might expect to find on the part of fundamentalist proponents of laws and policies that are clearly religiously motivated.
Ah, but if you could only see what I see…
4. Not owning a car. Living where we do, owning a car would actually be a big, expensive incovenience. I love the freedom that comes with not owning one.
Cast On: 5/4/10
I needed five minutes before I could face this morning porridge of duty and love and joy, which Roger usually shares with me. So I flicked open my iPhone and I glanced at Facebook. My west coast friend Elizabeth had already posted a link to Emily Rapp's Slate essay on Rick Santorum's abortion politics and the facts of her son Ronan's life. It's a great essay, and you all should read it. As Elizabeth notes on her own blog, Rapp writes about paradox, about the pain of holding contradictory ideas in one's mind. I admire the essay and I admire Rapp's blog.
Abdul Nasser Maudany is a symbol of thousands of fabricated false cases in India. The campaign for the release of Maudany is a campaign for retaining democracy in India. We request all democratic and secular people to involve in this campaign to release Maudany, whereby we raise our strong voice against one of the most significant violations of human rights in this country.
Recently, my son Max's preschool sent out an email alerting us that an antisemitic group would be staging a demonstration at their facility. His preschool is part of a Jewish Community Center (JCC), an institution that is a fitness facility and hosts arts, cultural, youth and senior programming, and is open for membership to anyone. While I don't know much about the protesting organization, I know they don't particularly like Jewish people, homosexuals, or young men and women who died while serving in the military.
She's doing very well for the trauma she is going through.. She allows me to hold and comfort her, she is still wary of being picked up and held..but relaxes quickly. I get smiles and babbles on and off too and she makes good eye contact.
Preheat oven to 450 degrees. While the oven is preheating spread ranch on the pizza shell, add pork and top with crushed pineapple, red pepper, and cheese. Bake for 8-10 minutes or until crust is golden brown and cheese is bubbly.
Total Time: 65:29 min
These slightly different, alternating messages of unfulfilled encouragement continued on and off for at least ten minutes. Around the sixth or seventh time, the woman’s voice was replaced by a man’s, which I gathered to be an attempt to establish some higher level of authority, lest the caller was becoming agitated with the nice lady. Once he had re-established who was in charge here, the man’s voice left and the woman’s voice returned for several more pre-recorded assurances that they’d get to me whenever the hell they felt like it.
a) read them
Fareda: Leave her out of this! She has done nothing.
Toddlers can teach us a lot about babies through their three top favorite phrases, “No!” , “I help you,” and “I can do it myself!” When you can’t speak the language and the people around you seem totally, inexplicably inept at reading refined body language, those phrases give you power. The first allows you to protest invasions of your property and space, the second shows you are willing to participate and learn, and the last allows you to express that you can manage and show what you have learned. It stands to reason that pre-verbal babies are trying to convey similar desires once their basic needs are met and they begin to form preferences.
It was as if the Universe sent a not so gentle nudge to say “Be right here, right now; in this moment. I have a plan for you that is far better than you possibly could have imagined.” And so it was that Sunday afternoon we spent, just two souls eager for adventure and hungry for serenity. Answering the siren call beckoning us to the coast, it was a day that was utterly inspired. The rains had let up and it was gorgeous for a winter day. The deluge had left lush green in every corner of its wake. It was hard not to be happy and exhilarated with such raw, rustic beauty streaming by as we drove through Devil’s Slide and down to the coast highway. It was crystal clear and the sun was high.
Style: Old Ale
After a decade of “war on terror” rhetoric – and President Obama’s failure to reverse many of George W. Bush’s extrajudicial policies – the U.S. public has come to accept that American “exceptionalism” puts the nation beyond the reach of international law, as Nat Parry explains.
Chad: I’m going to buy this stock.
"He doesn't know anybody here. He just came down here, so he was bored, so he walked down to the store. He was on his way back home. I'm living down here. He was sitting on the porch and this man killed him."
Fuck you bitch.
She went to the city and got so so sadity
It took their combined effort, but the benches were successfully pinned down till the fluctuation passed.
Kiss the Killer.
The ISS also submitted information on an increase in violent crime committed by police officers.
Me: “Whatevs. Backitup backitup backitup.”
At first, dissociation was my main trick, and I was especially good at it. There is very little in this life that I undertake that I do not do especially well, expect for life itself, maybe. When I found alcohol, it was like an answer to a prayer. Something that took the pain away, and was socially acceptable, up to a point. Of course, because if I am going to do something, I am going to do it extremely well, I reached that point, and passed it by many, many miles. And now I am flogging myself with key strokes for not knowing another way to deal with my pain, or for putting a stop to the drinking before such a huge toll was taken…on me.
Once you’ve faced the ogre, you need to define what service quality means to your company and establish metrics by which you can measure the level of quality existing in your current service. You need to benchmark where you are today and set standards you would like to reach.
“It was specifically modeled as an experiment on my part,” says Sieger. “And I did that just to see if I could do it.” Heavy metal gates guard the single driveway in or out of the house on its man-made island, which sits in the center of a 14-acre property surrounded by thick hedgerows. There are also regular and infrared cameras on the main road, and cameras on all of the doors—perhaps a concession to the modern security needs of a 21st century mansion. “I was going to have the bridge be a drawbridge,” says Sieger, “but it cost too much to build.”
There are such a lot of blogging police about these days, telling us 'how to' and 'how not to', but when all's said and done, I reckon the majority of us blog what we like. And that, in my opinion, is exactly how it should be. I've had people emailing me in the past, telling me how to improve or change my blog, what I should write about, what I shouldn't, but all their emails get deleted into the ether, because frankly, this is my blog, not theirs.
.play at the plate
I didn't have any vanilla pods either so I used a tablespoon of vanilla bean paste - smells amazing and you can see the flecks of vanilla seeds if you look closely enough
OK, I know it sounds funny to have a drinking fetish, but it really has become quite a nuisance. Concerned he may have a physical problem, we have discussed it with our pediatricians, they have run all sorts of blood and urine tests on him, and he seems healthy as a horse. A just literally has almost no self control when he sees a drink. He has to have it. He has broken into juice boxes, drank formula from baby bottles (when N was a baby), made my tea disappear faster than I can blink, and shared drinks with more strangers than I care to admit. I have to always be aware of where liquid is. He has helped me choose to eliminate almost every chemical cleaner from my house and go with just vinegar because the risk of him drinking something is too great. While my other kids like playing with a cup of some sort in the bath, A can’t because he winds up drinking the dirty bath water. Of course, even without the cup, he still sucks it up in plenty, so I have to carefully supervise him. We have the same problem with pool water, which is more dangerous since it contains the chlorine. The biggest problem is that he also has a pea-sized bladder (no pun intended). When he drinks free-choice, he pees. A lot. I mean a WHOLE LOT! What goes in must come out. He still has to wear diapers at night because of his daily fluid intake.
“Parental Values and Practices Relevant to Young Children’s Social Development in Taiwan and the United States.” Journal of Cross-cultural Psychology 31 (2000): 677-702. Print.
on the shore of my middle finger that boreal dusk,
Boy Weasel was a Wiseman and when he was up on stage I told Julio that he was my boy. Julio was impressed at how grown up Boy Weasel was, "That's your kid? He has a beard!".
I heart it! You can wear it full on or pair it down so it’s a subtle wash of colour, either way if you love pink you must buy this. And also because I said so.
Every empire of the day had a civic religion. The Eastern Roman (Byzantine) Empire was Christian. Its rival Persia, meanwhile, was Zoroastrian. The Arab Empire quickly controlled and needed to unify huge expanses of territory where different religions predominated. The empire was growing quickly, soon rivaling the Byzantine and Persian Empires in size and power. But at first, it did not have a compelling political theology to compete with those it supplanted and to solidify its conquests. It needed a common religion -- a political theology that would provide the foundation for the empire's unity and secure allegiance to the state.
“This mail serves as a listening ear to the victims of scam all over the world.”
Look around you. Is your world familiar? Comfortable? Does it seem the same today as it was yesterday? It isn't.
03. Lexington (Joey Pea-Pot With A Monkey Face)
(Pull the lever to run into the wall again*)
3-4 T pitted Nicoise olives, chopped (optional)
XL: “No one else, just me and my laptop. Everything you hear on every Xtatic Line song was composed, recorded and produced by me. I play the guitar and piano so I thought I could pull it off and I think it worked out pretty well.”
The London hotels seem to be much more reasonably priced but I don't have a clue what area to stay in. I wonder if they'll let me sleep in Cath Kidston?? I'd also love to hear suggestions of stuff to do there. I mean, shopping, obviously, and Big Ben and double decker buses and Harry Potter and a pub, but what else?
Score: Carrie-Ann=8, Len=9, Bruno=8 for a total of 25 and a grand total of 61
There are a couple of other famous shipwreck events, including that of the "disappeared-into-thin-air" SS Waratah...all fascinating reading.
When I hear those lyrics I am reminded of so many of my clients. They come into therapy wanting deeper, more connected relationships. They have some idea of where there want to be. They’ve waded into a relationship and they love it. They love it so much that they want more, they want to go deeper. But they don’t seem to be able to. Something holds them back.
Out of this wood do not desire to go:
Let me address a couple of housekeeping things:
Dress, tights, skirt: Noa Noa
So who's Lee Schrager and why is his name bigger than mine on the book cover? Lee is the founder and director of the SoBe Festival and, more recently, the New York Wine & Food Festival, coming up on its fourth year. Lee is one of the most energetic, most creative people I know. Not only are his festivals tons of fun, they raise millions of dollars for good causes. Lee is connected, I'm sure, to two of every five people on the planet; at last count he had almost 7,000 people in his BlackBerry. So when he asked me to write the festival cookbook, I was thrilled.
Think mobile before apps. While all kinds of characters roam the fringes of academia trying to sell apps, anyone of any expertise emphasized how important it is to develop a mobile site first. The advantages are many — it works on all platforms and one need not negotiate with an Apple or Droid store, and wait for the process to play out for months so your users can access updates. This Cappex survey of parents of prospective students adds more support, as 79 percent of respondents preferred a mobile-friendly site to an app. While apps developers emphasize shiny objects and one-trick ponies, the mobile site is the big tent where you welcome all your users.
Campbell's Inc. clearly gave less than a lukewarm, runny shit about what went between the covers as long as there was something there besides clip art. Now you market this shit to newlywed girls with little to no clue, and put it on the table in front of a public who all smoked like fiends anyway, who's going to know any different, right?
“He that will not apply new remedies must except new evils, for time is the greatest innovator.” (Francis Bacon)
Have you always wanted to write?Yes. If you eat,sleep,dream and think writing you’re meant to be a writer. I can have a full blown conversation with you, watch a movie, edit a book, talk on the phone all while mentally constructing a new book.
Ingersoll-Rand 2135TiMAX 1/2-Inch Air Impact Wrench WORX WG912.51 2-Piece 18 Volt Lithium-Ion Cordless Combo Kit With Blower & String Trimmer Factory-Reconditioned DEWALT DC315KR 28V Cordless NANO Li-Ion 1-1/8″ Reciprocating Saw Kit DEWALT DCF895L2 20-Volt MAX Lithium Ion Brushless 3-Speed 1/4-Inch Impact Driver Genesis GL12DHOK2 12V Lithium-Ion Combo Kit-3/8-Inch Drill, Oscillating Tool, Close Quarter Hammer and 65 Accessories, 3-Piece Hitachi CR18DL 18-Volt Li-Ion Reciprocating Saw Kit Black & Decker NPP2018B 18 Volt Cordless Pole Chain Saw – Bare Tool (No Battery Or Charger) Greenworks 20602 20-Volt Lithium Ion 10-Inch Cordless Electric Chain Saw (No Battery or Charger) Makita (RJ01W) 12V Li Ion Reciprocating Saw Kit Makita JR3070CT Reciprocating Saw Bare-Tool Milwaukee 0719-20 Sawzall V28 Lithium-Ion Cordless Reciprocating Saw (Tool Only, No Battery) Bosch RS325 120-Volt 12-Amp Reciprocating Saw – US Fluke 116/322 HVAC Combo Kit Stiletto CB5TB TiBone Combo Kit, 5-Piece
03. Drain You
I ended the day at a signing that included several famous musicians and possibly a reality TV star or two. This occasioned the appearance of large crowds which gave me my first taste of what it will be like at ComicCon, I suspect. None of them were for me, of course, but it was brilliant people watching.
We urge you to adhere strictly to this final payment notification order and forward to this office the required information to enable us process and release your fund as soon as possible.
Thursday night I went to bed and woke up a few hours later with the sorest of sore throats ever. I knew that something was wrong and that I was "down" for the count. Friday most of the day was spent trying to remain fever free. Saturday came and my hubby had to take all the kids by himself to an Easter event. (I was ever so grateful.) By Saturday night I was debating whether or not to go to the ER. (Oh the misery- throat, glands, head, nose, aches, fever, chills, sweats.) Sunday morning I broke down and headed to urgent care.
Why do people find the Buzzcocks wimpy? This driving, angular dual-lead workout starts Motorik, then careens all over the M1 before missing the J42 interchange.
I can't believe how fast paced my life has been this year. Having visitors here for nearly 2 and a half months has reduced ny arty adventures as my art room has had people sleeping in there with beds literaly tucked right up too and under my desk LOL. My influx of visitors coincided with a wonderful friend Gail Hart from Tasmania staying at her sons place here in Darwin. I couldn't get up to see Gail till the last few weeks but when I did go I was in for a real treat as she has taught me the basics of lamp work bead making...and another door to arty goodness opens.
The night before, at our church choir rehearsal, the director commented on how much better I sound lately. I’m the only tenor in our small church choir, which has in many ways become The Little Engine That Could, And Rod, the director, wants more from me and my voice. He told me that because I am the only tenor, I need to make myself known and he likes it that I’m finally letting loose and singing my little heart out. “It won’t hurt my feelings if the only thing I hear is the tenor part,” he said. “The other parts are important, but the tenor part soars above all of it, and you being the only one, you need to make yourself heard and be as out there as you can be.”
Ok heres something that has been bugging me for a while, yet i dnt quite know why its happening......When i try to go to sleep at night, theres always this noise that keeps me awake....BIRDS SINGING!!!
While it may sound like a simple domestic drama, it isn’t. Not in the slightest. The director, Asghar Farhadi, uses the plot to discuss issues relevant both to Iranian society and our changing world; issues such as class, gender, and faith. I will try to avoid rhapsodizing about it, but the film is, honestly, breathtaking. Mr. Farhadi’s camera never wastes a shot, and the way it lingers and speaks softly gives power to the conflict of the film. He does not rely on neat camera tricks or flashy editing because doing so would, in my opinion, greatly detract from the film. The film is so powerful because of its simplicity. There is no reliance on visual stimulation; the actors live their roles and the camera watches them, taking us inside. The main reason I love this film so much is probably because I find longer shots more interesting than faster ones. Fast-paced editing, though appropriate in many films, gives the viewer no time to soak in the film, to interact with it, to feel it. A Separation gives plenty of time for these actions. It lets the conflict brew, slowly, and finally tensions explode, emotions run, but still in the same confined space. Still lingering, still watching. Still beautiful.
I remember a while back…like 10ish years ago…the actual Psychiatrist who gave me those diagnosis actually sat and talked to me for the entire 45 minutes to an hour. He was even the one who was going to do the talk therapy with me without giving that task to someone else. I’ve been to one since then and he only spent – at most – twenty minutes with me. All talk therapy he recommended was to be done by someone else. Someone in his office, but someone else nonetheless.
It was the worst experience to be a displaced person. Call it a nightmare. My family did not have our own place for almost one year; we were lucky to have few relatives who sheltered us temporarily. I clearly remember the discomfort and sadness in my parents’ eyes for occupying their friends’ space. We soon restarted life from scratch in the new town, renting someone’s basement first. I know how painful the people who are currently displaced must feel. No one deserves to go through such an experience.
When detangling your hair it is advised to start with your fingers. Finger detangling is the gentlest form of detangling. By using your fingers only, you can get rid of more than half of the shed hairs intertwined in your hair. It is best for removing those problem knots. It also makes it easier for you to use other detangling tools afterwards. After using your fingers, and if you so choose, detangling should be continued with a wide-toothed comb. The wide-toothed comb is another great detangling tool to get rid of the remaining shed and broken hairs and knots. It is always recommended that you start with a wide-toothed comb before proceeding to any other size comb, starting at the ends of the strands and working your way up gradually until the comb glides easily through the hair.
I wish I had 15 grand in a burial fund for when I depart this mortal plain, it would at that price be quite a send off!
Caramel Macchiato - rich coffee, caramel drizzle and vanilla cream.
85g/3 oz ground almonds
I love my son to pieces! He loves being a helper and DOES NOT EXPECT to get any money from me, my mother or his aunt. Giving him money for helping when he least expects it is a better moment to give it to him. However, he is 9 and not 29 so we have to indeed remember that when he is helping and doing things. He is still a child and should be treated like one and not expected to be any other way REGARDLESS how mature he is in the NATURAL and the SPIRITUAL…
A nice compilation of folky blues guitar from Kicking Mule on the Sonet label from 1974. Some fine instrumental and a couple of vocal tracks including such notables as Rev. Gary Davies, Stefan Grossman, Woody Mann etc.
Ricki Lake continues to be a strong contender for the win – what’s the deal with Derek Hough? What does HE do to get stellar performances from his partners? Mind you, he has been very lucky with his partners in the past… he rarely gets a ‘dud’. Ricki has eprsonality, she has talent and she was in Hairspray…. she’s got the motion of the ocean. This week, she found out that she has a pinched nerve, the doctor make sit sound like she could paralyzed if she coninues… but of course, she perseveres! Another great dance this week from Ricki, she’s making the race tough…
Still sunny, but I'm obliged to drop the adjective, "warm" and replace it with "chilly." We're hoping the temperatures won't dip into freezing territory during the night because our fruit trees are in full bloom. It would be so nice to have apricots and cherries this year.
It is old. It is also a pauper.
Brouwerij Lindemans Lindemans Kriek
Studying abroad is going to make employers look at you in a different light. Only about 4 percent of college kids ever choose to study abroad. If you are one of the few who has chosen to take this opportunity to widen your global horizons, employers will see you as a more valuable employee in this quickly shrinking world. If you have not only the ability to speak the language of a foreign country, but have the ability to understand them as individuals and business potential, you will be a far more valuable employee.
We left and drove about 30 miles to our next stop. Driskill Mountain is the highest natural summit in Louisiana with an elevation of 535 feet above sea level. Although the word mountain is in its name, Driskill Mountain is actually a tall hill. Its elevation is well below the level considered to be a mountain.
why Hollywood do so well in the World.
They had hot dogs and chips and a veggie tray and some snacks. The kids had fun playing on the trampoline, and in and out of the house, and eating. They played a "pin the tail on the donkey" game, but without a tail or donkey. It was something with pawprints, I think. I wasn't paying that close attention - hehehe.
And the God of our fathers, who were led out of Egypt, out of bondage, and also were preserved in the wilderness by him, yea, the God of Abraham, and of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, yieldeth himself, according to the words of the angel, as a man, into the hands of wicked men, to be lifted up, according to the words of Zenock, and to be crucified, according to the words of Neum, and to be buried in a sepulchre, according to the words of Zenos, which he spake concerning the three days of darkness, which should be a sign given of his death unto those who should inhabit the isles of the sea, more especially given unto those who are of the house of Israel. (1 Ne. 19:10)
I swear I will get around to returning your lovely comments. I appreciate the amazing regulars who read my dribble and comment every post, brings a tear to my eye :'-) Sending everyone virtual love, good karma and lollipops!
Einstein's General Theory of Relativity explains how gravity works. In the simplest possible terms, mass causes space (actually, spacetime) to warp. It's often pictured by imagining a stretched rubber sheet with balls of different weights placed on the sheet, causing it to warp in different ways. At the same time, the warping of space (spacetime) affects the paths bodies take as they move through space(time). Think, for example, how your movement changes going over hilly terrain as opposed to a flat surface. Physicists say that "mass tells spacetime how to warp; spacetime tells mass how to move."
Here’s the challenge: whether you consciously and deliberately choose a culture or not, there will be a culture. It will be whatever decisions and actions you support, reward, and tolerate.
This past weekend I signed up for Bettina May's Pin-Up Hair and Makeup class at Beauty Bar NYC on 14th Street. It started at noon on a Sunday morning. I rolled in with no makeup on and sunglasses. I couldn't believe I was up this early for makeup and hair! The course was 6 hours long, and I came prepared with an avocado, nuts, and some hummus. I know from shooting with other photographers that modeling is exhausting. Yes! Bettina shoots you at the end of the hair and makeup makeover so you go home with all your shots burned on a CD so you can edit them as you like.
Raw Rice, 1 tablespoon
Janice: I’m doing all of the usual things: twittering, posting to my main Facebook page, asking for help from my tribe (my dream team/readers). Beyond all of that, several key things have happened to draw attention to the group. My agent (Chip MacGregor) offered to run a promotional piece on his blog. That stirred up a lot of activity. Next, several of the passengers on the cruise spread the word to their friends. Before long, men, women and children joined in. Friend and fellow author Randy Ingermanson blogged about the event. I’m also excited to announce that Tricia Goyer has invited me to be her guest on the evening of April 10 as she hosts a Facebook party and live chat about the Titanic.
For once, I really like both of the final two, and think Ali has a tough decision on her hands. Not that this show is in any way real, but you know, suspension of disbelief and all that. Rumor has it that Ali doesn’t up with either guy, though. All I know is that I will be watching the finale on Monday, ready for some more ABC created drama! And I will probably be reading the Television Without Pity message boards several times daily to overanalyze Ali’s outfit choices, and then checking out Reality Steve for new spoilers. Not that I am into this show or anything.
Or so it seemed,
The good news is, once you have this done you can send it out to a lot of people over and over until you need to update it. It is especially good to have when you are doing a private gig or a big holiday gig and the venue wants to approve the acts first. For example, here are two one-pagers that Stormy Leather and I submitted to The Beehive's New Year's Eve party in Boston, MA.
Mix all the ingredients together in a bowl and then spread all over your (cooled) cake.
I want to live in a world where all the youth have the opportunity to succeed. Where people of all kinds, shapes and backgrounds have choice in their lives and the opportunity to step into the greatness of who they can be. I want everyone to know that they were made for greatness and capable of amazing things–as one man said, that they were born to make a difference. I want the people of this world to live in safe communities, to have the opportunity to build loving families, loving relationships and a beautiful world as far as the imagination can stretch–farther even. I want to live in a world where love and joy are the primary currency of human interaction and safety is something that is not fought for but a baseline upon which all else is built. I want to create a world where I would be overjoyed to welcome new children into it and invite them to take part in something integral to and yet far greater than any individual. I want to live in a world where all people know themselves as beautiful, whole and perfect–where this is a fact and a foundation of human consciousness. A world where healing is the fine art that it always strives to be, an act of perfect love, perhaps even unneeded, where every human cell in the body is known and cherished and where people are preserved in their natural dignity, honored and cared for. A world of unity of oneness amidst all the breadth of human diversity. I want to live in a world of love. I want to create a world of love.
Our trip to the Denbigh Moors and Gwylfa Hiraethog had been planned for some time, but what was unexpected was the snow. A snow storm passed through the night before, frosting the landscape while still allowing the rich, moorish colors to show through.
I know I've been preaching and preaching about not buying things in "boxes" and off the shelves pre packaged... but there is ONE item I love... that I DO buy pre packaged... and that's Trader Joes, precooked Brown Rice,in the frozen food section... in a green box. I LOVE THAT STUFF! It has one ingredient... BROWN RICE... and it's the MOST convenient way to prepare it, when in a hurry... 3 packages for 3 bucks... and it's delish!
RPK details representative democracy and true democracy here. The article is very good but RPK also has the occasional and somewhat fatal shortfall of practicing what he preaches. MCLM has disgraced itself in 2012 by speaking against LGBTs and turning on Opporisiton leader Anwar. This has led to Tengku Dr. Haris Ibrahim and several other prominent member quitting MCLM to work on ABU instead, However MCLM still has the 20 candidates it has earmarked, doubtless many of which are less than ideal but not being entrenched politicians and fresh faces, also non-family nepotism linked and amenable to non-partisan non-hegelian dialectic politics, would be better than the Pakatan Oppositions term limitless and nepotistic paradigms, or BN’s corrupt, authoritarian racist AND term limitless and nepotistic paradigms.
So get your act together people. Learn some theater etiquette. (Click here if you are clueless.) Spend those few extra minutes to make the experience pleasant for all or stay home so the rest of us can enjoy it.
More irksome, however, is Lepore’s analysis of the Second Amendment’s meaning. By leaving out or misrepresenting key historical details, she shortchanges the idea that the Second Amendment protects an individual right.
Officially Guitar Wolf’s music is listed as “jet rock ‘n’ roll” and it’s a pretty apt description. Blending Ramones style punk with rockabilly, noise and garage rock n’ roll Guitar Wolf have their own unique style and they are bringing it to Newcastle in June 2012.
Sloppy Joes (using leftover flopped Meatloaf I made last week & home canned tomato juice)
Pot Walloper – 4.4% – Ruby Coloured beer
That’s all for an introduction.. As for the blog post:
The lady nodded and showed him her hand. On the ring finger she wore the stone cut to match the one Christopher had, to form a perfect circle if brought together.
Well, I've been out having fun.
Now, for example, lets use high-school as an example demographic. If a boy in high-school ranks a girl as a 10, then that means she is one of the (if not the) most pretty girls of the other girls in her school. But once she goes off to college, she is now thrown into a larger demographic, the college demographic… full of women in their utmost prime, so her once to be 10 rank now is most likely to drop to an 8 or 9 unless of course she really is that gorgeous.
pamphlet publication & 20 free copies (for three/four first-stage winners),
Thing is, when I landed on this miserable rock, there were only 4.5 billion humans on Earth. I had everything staked out - I was gonna conquer America, penetrate the Bermuda Triange, play speed garage on the Great Wall of China! Even a youthful Howard Jones reckoned he could raise £500 for Help The Aged by shaking everybody in the world's hand and getting to know them better. Everyone could find a seat on the tube. There were 2.5 billion less people and, by dint, 2.5 billion less irritating tossers fouling up the air.
Create Hugs Edna
Tonight? Today? It’s not quiet on His front anymore. The pop quiz is over for the moment. I may have not passed with flying colors (in my opinion), but I passed… Thankfully.
There are around twenty or so rules for the correct use of commas.
Make up shit so you can sue me!
And before you speak.
Cooling mask - Singapore is a super hot country and we are always exposed to sun, thus this cooling masks helps to repair and hydrate my skin. It's a super refreshing and soothing mask. You should try!
PROBLEM: I don't like to exercise. It's boring and I don't like staring at a wall (i.e. treadmill, elliptical, etc.). But if I don't use a cardio machine, how do I know how far I'm running or how many calories I *really* burned?
What if I only buy organic?
Addison jumped when she heard Zak’s voice, Zak yanking her arm and pulling her away from a demon that was about to grab her from behind.
Flushing, Michigan Principal Joe Reinfelder says this about the recent program: “Great! Best bullying assembly we have seen. We look forward to the follow up.”
Clint Richardson (realitybloger.wordpress.com)
So I'm pretty sure he's going to try to figure this whole baby thing out soon. Good thing I only have to have "the talk" with the girl. The girl that really, really doesn't like to talk about things. I'm good with that. So Daddy, who carries boys in his tummy, you have fun with explaining things to the little guy.
Lastnight myself and Marcus Bronzy hit Camden Town to catch Mz Bratt perform at her sold-out headline show in Barfly.
Editing and design also make a logical pairing because they rely heavily on one another. If you can think about design tricks while you’re editing, such as the use of alternative story forms, the result will be more cohesive and effective. Similarly, if you’re aware of grammar, punctuation and syntax, designing will be much easier. Instead of designing a logo and then realizing the emphasis should be on a different word, by having a background in editing, you’ll be able to see these important cues from the start.
China? You can have that too. I saw a Richard Gere movie where he got in deep doo-doo for something he supposedly said or did there. Besides, if you want to visit a communist state, there’s always California.
While writing this, I've discovered that it is based on the memoir "This Dark World" by Carolyn S. Briggs. Many parts were too close for comfort... but done so beautifully and in such a trusting, honest manner that the flashbacks to my own first, second and third tastes of Belief as a child of the '70s, '80s and '90s were more cathartic than painful.
Well, possibly, but a two-cent increase in the price of stamps isn’t going to be what does it. I still believe $0.46 is an incredible bargain to send a letter anywhere in these United States, and some things still call for more formality than email. Also, there are still plenty of entities who use direct mail advertising via the USPS.
I realize that these arguments are a bit low brow, but we are not dealing with smart people here. We are dealing with libertarians.
I'll take a little break now. Look for birds.
Something new will come along eventually, but Malian time has no standard units. Whatever is just around the corner can take years, even decades to arrive. For my Malian peers, it is hard to understand why I, a foreigner, feel nostalgia for something that is not mine and is not yet gone. It is a legitimate cultural divide.
3. Do you identify with (or wish you were) a fictional character? Who is that?
1 melts
Download and install the iExplorer program.
They rejoice in a Grace and a Bounty from Allah and that Allah will not waste the reward of the believers.
Now’s concert crunch time. This year I’ve been remarkably calm. Perhaps the big, creative push of the fall and winter producing my video and my new recording have upped my adrenaline to a nice cruising altitude. Maybe it’s experience — having done this so many years in a row, I have things down to a science. I like to think we’ve settled into a Band nicely, and now music can just continue to flow.
As I was putting them into boxes I started to think about time. All the time that it took for me to collect these things. All the time that they spent on my wall. All the time that I missed out on playing with these guys. But then I realized that I didn’t even play with my opened packed toys anymore… so why should these be any different.
Jesus must have stood up by now. The excitement probably causes him to pace a little while he looks up to heaven with a tight grin, acknowledging his Father’s approval. He is sharing this moment with his Abba. I’m sure a couple of fist-pumps and a half whispered “Yessss” happen too.
I realized this week that I really miss going to yoga. It's not just the hot and sweaty workout that I miss, it's the time I spend not thinking. For 90 minutes I think about nothing but holding a pose that I can hardly do, not puking and trying to control my breathing. 90 minutes of no work, not junior league, no housework. So I'm going to work it back into my schedule. I think it makes me a happier person.
Term two started this week just gone.
My push to get some persuasive writing completed, even if I was ever so supportive, knowing it is not our favourite thing to work on, resulted in tears (first Video Boy, then Wombat Girl because I was helping him too much), anxiety, stress, flinging oneself onto the reading couch in despair, and me running to the loo to have a quiet cry in despair. Maybe the constant rain around here hasn't helped. But I lost it this week. Lost my temper and my mojo.
Interview by Bart Steenhaut
Pink Floyd- The Wall
Ecourbe Cils De Chanel Precision Eyelash Curler
Seems to be moving fast
2 T fennel seeds
And saw the last thing he wanted to see. Long, black spines, following the impossible twists of the Sherim's internal structure, reaching for him along what he knew had to be the shortest route. Clearsight at least told him how far away the Axtli was, let him judge how long he had. Seconds.
We stayed at my mom’s house this weekend and decided to take a trip to the zoo aka rip-off central. Look, I’m the first to admit that I’m pretty frugal with most things, so my opinion may be a bit skewed, but a simple day at the zoo shouldn’t set you and your mom back $80, should it? $40 to get in, $40 on crappy food.
“Suspicious person was removed from a Lay Hall classroom.”
Well we’re about half way through the 4 th with a score of 13-7 , and the rain is starting to come down heavier now.
Rnd 10: ch 3, dc in next 14 dc, 2 dc in next dc, *dc in next 15 dc, 2 dc in next dc; repeat from* around to last 2 dc; dc in last 2 dc; join with sl st to 1st dc (70 dc)
But astrology isn’t just an old and fusty arcane art—it’s still being practiced today. For example, if any of you have had computer issues, phone issues (raises hand), conversational hang-ups, issues with contracts or agreements, or just plain old cases of ‘things-not-going-right’ in the past few weeks, take heart:
Post anything creative that you've been working on!
In striving to reform both Church and state, Pius encountered vehement opposition from England’s Queen Elizabeth and the Roman Emperor Maximilian II. Problems in France and in the Netherlands also hindered Pius’s hopes for a Europe united against the Turks. Only at the last minute was he able to organize a fleet which won a decisive victory in the Gulf of Lepanto, off Greece, on October 7, 1571.
Now for some inspiration from the team...first of all a huge thanks to Donna, our guest designer this month.
Thursday: Tuna Helper (kids love them!!)
Now you've lost me. These is a generalization. It's also going in the wrong direction. The line above says "is nothing if you don't take action." The logical sequence then is to tell us what action she takes, not veer off into what she sees in action, or wondering about other things.
Avalon (Stu Linder)
9. Carefully dry the edges of the fabric with a heat tool from the center outward. As the heat tool gets hot, the material will burn and shrink. Move the flower in circular motion while doing this process. Otherwise you will burn too much and not have even layers.
Paranormal Activity 2 once again locates the source of the supernatural in the feminine. New mommy Christie is chosen as the target for the demon’s shenanigans. In a scene that echoes Katie’s bedside abduction, Kristi is dragged down the stairs of her two-story home and into the basement. The tension is palpable as we wait for her to emerge, the sped up camera footage indicating she was down there for 45 minutes to an hour. When she does come back, she’s a changed woman. Daughter Ali notices and documents the change with her handheld camera. We get glimpses of the teeth marks on Christi’s left thigh and later are witness to an exorcism conducted under the guidance of the superstitious female housekeeper Martin. It is only with her help and knowledge of the “spirits” that husband Daniel is able to subdue his demon-wife with a cross covered in oil, the symbol of Christ’s anointing.
common for YOU, but not many others have 130 NO VOTES.
It was easy to make.
I hope you will take this opportunity to explore a bit of vegan cooking and to come up with something new and unique! If you are a bit lost for ideas you can draw some inspiration from some of the past soups I have posted by clicking here.
There were many words of wisdom I heard from my parents growing up. I’ve recently managed to forget my Mom’s wise advice a couple times and unfortunately suffered the consequences. She always told me not to drop sharp knives into the soapy dishwater but instead hold them by the handle while washing them. Well the other day I reached into the dishwater to retrieve a sharp knife I was letting soak and promptly cut my finger. Ouch!
Zodiac signs: Cancer, Scorpio, Pisces
"Greenie! Ow ya doing mate?"
2) Between Shades of Gray, by Ruta Sepetys. A fairly dire but well-written YA historical about Lithuanians relocated to Siberian labor camps during World War II. I said: "It is a side of World War II that you might not have seen before. I certainly hadn’t heard these stories of displaced Europeans, and I have to say, having been to Lithuania on tour last year, it made so much of what they said have deeper meaning. I found their fierce national pride lovely and charming when I was there; after this novel, it seems incredibly brave and honorable."
So whether they've been a friend for 20 minutes or 20+ years,
This committee is now under fire for glossing over many incidents and not giving proper weight to the allegations and incidences. One politician involved in the original inspection, Vic Marijnen, was even elected as prime minister of the Netherlands in the 1963.
Or it was a guy who wanted you to think he was the kind of guy that would do that. I plan to check this liver story out with an addiction medicine specialist just as soon as I can track one down, but it sounds like nonsense to me. So what's the point of all this? He doesn't have one (seriously, check for yourself).
"Impossible is nothing." - Yoda
I have several projects in the works, and I'll be posting about those, promoting other etsy shops, and possibly sharing some patterns or ideas as I go. I don't always work from a pattern, and often make things up as I go, so patterns aren't always available for my original works- I'd share them if there was!
At four a.m., the dog--a failure as a bloodhound but still a loyal watchdog--barks once.
In the end, though, I enjoyed the kalbi taco more. Maybe it's because of the thickness of the meat, but it also seemed more flavorful to me.
Our hotel did well to lessen the weight of my stress though. We got hooked up with a nice room in the brand new Standard Hotel, courtesy of Matt Wang. (thanks Matt!) After some rest we met up with Ginger, ate lunch at Barbuto, and walked the highline. Ginger showed us around, and that night we ate at Freemans's, where her boyfriend is the chef. Decompression complete, begin vacation.
Instead, my epiphany might smell like woodsmoke, or sweat, or Autumn. Maybe it'll sound like rain on a tin roof, or crickets chirping, or laughter. Perhaps it'll look like fresh turned earth, rich and brown, or spray paint on a wall, or the flash of a raccoon's eyes at night, bright, inquisitive, and utterly wild.
She had a Rocker dog nipping at her heals!
Assuming positive intent calls upon us to seek out the good in others before we judge them. Obviously, partners would go along way toward achieving a highly positive relationship if they assumed positive intent in the other, but today I am far more concerned with how parents assume it in their children.
No. This was clarity, the sign that David was finally stirring again, after long tossing and turning in the sleep of death. David’s offenses, lethal to Uriah, injurious to Bathsheba and to himself, were first and foremost sins against God: The God who created him, and Uriah and Bathsheba; the God who’d made Uriah and Bathsheba one flesh in marriage; the God whose image Uriah bore when David struck him down by trickery. David ungratefully forgot who it was that repeatedly delivered him from the murderous hand of Saul, and who made him king in Jerusalem, and who had promised by solemn covenant that his throne would endure forever. David scoffed at the greatness of the giver of the Sixth and Seventh commandments, as he would not have done, had he not first forgotten the First: “I am the LORD your God; have no other gods before me.”
In this current economic climate (hitherto to be referred to in this blog as 'this CEC'), I'd be the last person in the world to defend fat cat company bosses.
(Dec. 13th) with our preschoolers. One of our students Grandmother is visiting tomorrow to share her Swedish family tradition. She is bringing ginger cookies for all and will dress her granddaughter in the traditional white dress with red sash, green wreath crown of candles while she tells the story of St. Lucia. Today we prepared for her visit by making paper plate wreath crowns and star wands. The children enjoyed using the glitter paint and gluing the paper leaves on their clowns. I'm really happy with how they turned out. We invited everyone to dress in red and white tomorrow; with their paper crowns and star wands I anticipate some cute photos!
However, to state the obvious, the term coconut is derogatory, at least the way intellectual Memela uses it. “There are many coconuts or non-whites — that is, blacks who aspire to be whites — who confuse skin colour with blackness. These coconuts always complain that they are being made to carry the burden of ‘blackness’.” This is the most interesting conundrum: “who confuse skin colour with blackness”. I realise, in his own studious, thoughtful manner, our intellectual is trying to make a case for a specific black identity which he never defines. But the very attempt to do so subverts the fact he says “authentic blacks” (whatever/whoever the hell they are) cannot be racist. A non-racist is one who does not discriminate. So “authentic blacks” (one readily assumes Memela is one), would not accuse other people of being “different” or “coconuts” as they are non-racist and do not discriminate. Contradiction after contradiction.
Be a Follower of Crowley Party
When I first started 1.5yrs ago, I quickly fell in love with PTI products. I still do as a matter of fact. They are high quality and versatile. I joined the forum, and was rather impressed at the community we had there. People helped each other out and the Design Team personally answered questions. You don't see such a place online very often these days.
I am tempted to put a little study of “eternal life” at this point. I have an intense desire to teach you how the Bible is its own dictionary. Some of you who have sat for years under the traditions of men, have difficulty reading in context. Let’s see if just pasting a few “eternal life” verses here, will help you define it.
It has a deep impact on most people when heard, no matter what the circumstances might be. It’s also an adjective that can be used to describe a whole range of feelings and emotions when calmer vocabulary seemingly just won’t do. A lot of people refuse to even utter the letters that comprise its meaning, because by even saying it you have accepted a certain responsibility for choosing such a descriptive word. There are some who freely accept it as an expressive term, while others have run away from it for as long as they’ve heard its sound. Yes, I am talking about the musical category known as Fusion.
Yesterday the neighbourhood ospreys returned to find a pair of eagles had moved into and renovated the nest they’ve kept for years. An aerial battle ensued between the easy, larger-than-thou, lord of the sky and the swift, determined, sudden and unexpectedly homeless one. This morning the massive tangle of twigs and branches atop the tall leaning pole was empty. For now.
Fair warning: There is a musical involved. But it is only three minutes. You will live.
No. It is fluid. Air moves. Wind moves. You move. So allow this ebb and flow, and some days you will feel, “Oh, I am definitely in the third!” And when you feel that, sit and let the expansion that is being flooded through you to fill your heart, your soul, your being, your body, and float away. And claim, and relish, enjoy, luxuriate.
The system for state and local government workers was fully funded when the last recession began. Its ratio of assets to projected costs dropped to as low as 65 percent after a 28 percent drop in value from December 2007, when the slump started, to June 2009, when it ended, as the global downturn depressed equity and property values.
and do we work so hard for things that are never enough, can never fill us up and are endlessly insufficient?
so i’ve changed. i think i know why. junior Carlo sucks. he had this weird thing that he wishes he forgets. i wished that weird and embarrassing thing never happened. i was shy. so i renovated myself during my senior thing. it was good. i became better, i think. plus, the senior Carlo back in high school was a cool one. he wasn’t really a nerd.
...will a five gallon drum of Charlie's Soap Laundry Powder last?
Go!!! And we're off. It took me almost a minute to get to the actual starting line. Along with everyone else around me I hit my watch when my foot landed on the line.
Creating jobs is not difficult for government. What is difficult is creating jobs that produce wealth.
And as he said this, he show d them his hands and his feet.
Shannon is loving high school She played on the volleyball and softball teams this year as well as being elected to student council. Last week she was re-elected for the Sophomore student council. She's keeping her straight A's and working very hard. Next year she hopes to add children's theater, Youth & Government, and National Honor Society to her already busy schedule. So proud of our girl!
Her positive notices on Broadway gained attention across the country. Hollywood studios, recognizing Ms. Nast’s qualities, were soon harnessing her star power in motion pictures. Starting with United Artists, she worked under various studio contracts, where she shared the screen with such luminaries as Charlie Chaplin, Douglas Fairbanks, W.C. Fields, Joan Crawford, Elvis Presley, Bruce Dern, and Tom Selleck. The list of directors she worked with reads like a history of motion pictures starting with F. W. Murnau, D.W. Griffith, Cecil B. DeMille, Orson Welles, Alfred Hitchcock, Billy Wilder, Sam Fuller, Roger Corman, Brian DePalma, and many more in such films as “The Undeveloped Heart,” “Hey You… You’ll Do,” “Hag You Very Much,” “The Slanted Eye” “You Forsake Me,” Elvis Presley’s “Whoopie Cat” and “The Lion’s Roar” for which she won the Oscar for Best Supporting Actress in 1943.
Here’s the deal, when I ask someone how they are, I personally don’t care how busy they are, if I wanted to know how busy you were, I would ask how busy are you. When someone tells us that they are busy the underlining message is, they don’t really want to talk to you and even if that is not the case, it still seems that way. Busy is a good thing and it’s great to be busy, but going around telling me that you busy and that is how you are doing, you are missing the question. To many times do I get the response that they are so busy with work and extra stuff, news flash we are busy in our normal lives, doesn’t mean you have to respond that you are busy.
Last Friday, April 1, I received a phone call from Pat at Niemann foods. Did I know why he was calling?
I did it for you, Dons…
09/14/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1252.40 10/15/2010 1367.11 -114.66
the weather
Gone are the mealtime pills, the bigger-than-a-prenatal-vitamin pair. We'll have to collect the leftover supplies from school, her best friend's house, and the Pastor's pocket.
My favorite is my freshest one, whatever it is I suddenly remember today that I had forgotten all about. It might be the nighttime walks down the street when I was four, with my dad, and there was a creek under the road, and on the road would be 1000’s of toads eating bugs drawn to the streetlight there. But I have remembered that before, so it cannot be my favorite memory today.
But I prefer my deities with a heap of mystery—
National Developments in the Intersection of IPR and Competition Law: from Maglite to Pirate Bay
We have 2 more scholarships to give in his memory this year. One for a high school football player and for a member of their church youth group.
We have a winner of the snow stick contest..the snow left March 13 at about 3:30PM. Chance will reveal the winners and the prizes tomorrow:)
2 See Emily Play 2:52 May 21, 1967 - Acetate With Alternate Ending
Take a look at the view.
But the times, they are a’changin’. From my vantage point of BD for Mozilla apps initiative, I get some sense as to where developers are devoting their time and talents and I’m amazed by what is going on in the music industry.
Beer blogging has broadened the reach of real beer, it has given air to opinions and trends and marketing strategies, it has allowed those undiscovered diamonds to find an appreciative audience and it has brought together some good honest beer lovers who love to share a beer – real or virtual. These ‘good blogs’ are also keeping at bay the dangerous beer geeks and uppity beer snobs so, keep up the good work, all of you!
I'm asking you to keep someone very close to me in your prayers. My step daughter-in-law is going to court tomorrow to fight for custody of her only child. She's a terrific mom, wife and stepmom to her hubby's 3 children...she's an amazing lady and has a full plate with her family, plus, she's going for her B.S. in Nutrition. Her mother started stirring up her caldron (buzz word for witch and beyond if you get my drift) in Oct. Her mother is not a very pleasant person to be around, has this permanent scowl on her recently altered stretched face. She was upset because her grandson was not allowed to visit with her on a weekend, which she gets every other week, because Dana reprimanded him for something he did at school, his punishment was to stay at home that weekend and clean his room and help his stepfather in cleaning out the garage. The woman went into an uproar and that's when the problems began.
These songs are fucking awesome...everything about this stuff rules. The vox, and the drums especially. Enjoy.
That circling affect is one of the reasons that we called it Hula Hoop Genealogy. Because researchers feel like they are going around and around in circles like a hula hoop and just like hula hoops they never actually get anywhere. But the saga of Linsey’s parents and the extra generations doesn’t end here. Once I knew who had published everything on the web, it was just a matter of a little digging to get their email address and send an email. A few emails back and forth along with a little digging trying to find anyone with documentation I uncovered another problem.
I remember Monday well, because while I was trying to sort everyone out, I lost concentration and flooded the kitchen! Whoever redesigned the kitchen/utility made a pigs-ear of the outside pipe from the washing machine, which has a small u-bend. Last year I discovered (when I almost flooded the kitchen) that water gets trapped and frozen there, so for the last month I have been putting the outlet pipe into a large plastic box, and emptying it manually.
Jake talked about his sister. Jake shared that he is the first in his family, at the age of fifteen, to have never smoke or drank or fought or have yet had sex, all things to which Jake assigns much worth. Jake shared that he struggles every day in a world that models, albeit falsely, that hero means doing and being something Jake is not, a world where hero means self-harm.
It didn’t hurt that McDreamy was on the back of our programs, either! :0)
The Battle to Life
The worst corner is the puppy cage — rusty, squalid with faeces, and utterly desolate.
Is it sad that I've sat here for several minutes trying to think of an interesting thing about myself and all I could come up with is the fact that I hate wearing socks?
"I don't know. There are no words. They haven't been invented yet.
Festival location: Slottskogen (Linnéplatsen / Majorna )
Going on the Big Green Egg at about 375F direct over the coals. I’m not 100% sure how long it took to cook, I ended up putting a meat probe in it and waited till it said 135F in one side and 125 in the other, thicker side. I wanted different temps for different people’s tastes.
Cover 3 was a nice surprise. I look forward to returning to try out their Chop-house burger, and seeing if they get local beers on tap.
Not to put too fine a point on it, but my goddamn fucking shower is trying to kill me.
This is the exact kind of scene you want to milk. You’ve set up a dangerous situation. The stakes are through the roof (literally). You’ve left your youngest character alone. Go to town with this scene. Zoe watches them, for example, from the underground “periscope,” and thinks she sees breathers running towards them. She has to warn them, but has no way to. We cut back and forth between the breathers getting closer and Zoe trying to open a hatch she’s not strong enough to open. The brothers milk every second of this scene, and appropriately so, as it’s the perfect kind of scene you want to milk.
if a used condom floated to shore
We arrived very early at Thialf, so much so that we got an extremely close parking spot – just steps away from the oval’s own lot – which was a very good thing, because at this point both of us were quite ready for lunch. (This is turning into a recurring blog theme … How We Haven’t Yet Learned To Eat Lunch On Time.) But no problem, we thought – we’d hop over to Thialf and pick something up. We were so excited, both at the prospect of forthcoming food, and that we were finally at a place we’d heard so much about, and from which we’d watched so many live-streamed races online.
"Rulers, Ruling All Things" by Midlake - Their sound is theme music for some of my writing. It inspires me.
I guess that's where I get my love of story telling. Thanks for the laugh mom! I wish you could blog, you'd love it!
Now, I never understood these guys emotionally. Almost never. And for me, FOR ME, that’s the disconnect that puts me in the gay column. It wasn’t the sex, it was the mind. For me, again only for me, the two never jibed – the sex and the emotion with the dudes and that bothered me. With the ladies, it did. And by the way, certain ladies. Not every feckin’ lady under the sun. I say that because the minute you say you’re a lesbo or in a gay relationship, everyone wants to say to you, “Hey, what about that ass on Angelina Jolie, huh? Isn’t it nice? Don’t you want to tap it?” Yes, I can appreciate her ass, but I can also appreciate Brad’s and no I don’t want to tap either of them. I don’t want to tap everything with a vagina. Sorry, but I don’t. Some vaginas actually totally annoy me like Snooki and Sam-Wow or whatever the feck her name is. So there.
Even as the party was pondering its next move, the choice was made for them as another troll appeared at the end of the vaulted hall. Alurax fired an arrow at it and it started to retreat, perhaps reluctant to meet them on advantageous ground. They poured back into the hall and deployed to attack. Elysia used her Wand of Illumination to cast Sunburst but even though she used it twice, the troll was undaunted and pressed home its attack.
*is always YELLOW
We bought 16 items – 24 if you count each coolant bottle / yaffa block separately – for a total estimated value of $385.92, leading to a profit of $324.42. To earn that much after taxes you’d really have to earn $460; money saved (by not having to spend it) is actually worth more than we realize when the government’s cut is taken into consideration.
This bedroom had about forty trash bags filled with clothes. There was a male cat in the room that they didn’t even know was in the house. He had urinated all over and the smell was horrible. The sacks covered a water-bed, and I was scared the first time I caused a ripple and all the trash bags started moving. I thought there might be some giant worm-like creature nesting underneath the bags. In the corner I found some computers. One was open and filled with a liter of kittens that didn’t make it.
Have a great weekend! I hope you can recover from losing that hour! (tear)
Legionaire's Disease Band would continue to travel back and forth for nearly 10 years with the same line-up before finally being derailed by drugs. They had started the band to wake people up, and did a good job of it. But when girls and dope took priority, they ultimately lost their purpose and decided to end it. They played their final gigs in 1988 with Nicki Sicki of Verbal Abuse filling in on bass after Norman and Gwen had left.
were all outside.
Not all seven made the cut, I only had a few select favourites, those that didn’t make it will most likely get a second chance if I decide to return to them in future.
They were a huge disappointment.
I wished he would have put that kind of effort into our relationship... into his health... into finding a job.. because if he had, we would still be together. No, we may still be together. And I wish some more. It's hard to push somebody out of your life when you still love them. I do love him. I will always love him. But together like we have been, we are toxic.
- Rubber duckies
Now go back and look at the pictures in the Mirage of ’38 and bask all over again in all of our high school years, when our motto was “to be rather than to seem.” If those carefree gay student days could be relived, and we had plenty off time on our hands, we’d be dreaming great dreams. On homecoming our queen would reign, and where at this junction our lives would be in flux, we would attributed it to our growin’ up too fast and to ambitions that far exceeded our prospects.
11. The Westing Game - Raskin (1978)
1 illuminated
When I was young, four was the “in” number in a family. I had one brother, most of my friends had just one sibling. Back then, the American dream included a house, two cars, a dog and two kids, preferably one boy and one girl. These days, though, it seems that most families are opting for three kids. It seems that a lot of couples have decided that five is a good family number. Have you noticed? I’m not sure about other parts of the country, but down in Texas, three kids is definitely popular. Whenever I see a family of five – especially with three boys, I can’t help but stare longingly and wonder about their family dynamic… who’s the shy one?... who’s the athlete?... which one is more like dad?
*Removable soft toy
We thank God, the Navy Corpsmen that taught me first aid, all the doc's, nurses and paramedics I have known, and the doc's, nurses and paramedics that share their valuable knowledge on the internet and in classes. Thanks. You all make a huge difference. :^)
We got to see the moon, Venus (which I had actually been seeing for several days out the bathroom window and didn't know it), Saturn, Regulus, and we are pretty sure we got to see Mars. We all enjoyed getting to see the planets before the cloud cover hit again.
9.) Your favorite YA book not in a movie (yet)—who plays main character(s)?
"Riverdance: Not in our name! You do not represent us!" cries Raymond Deane (from 2:20).
By the way, all these ebony drawings took me about two/three hours tops, and half of that time was spent keeping track of an active toddler. That's FAR faster than either of the first two drawings.
We went to New York this summer to stay with my husband's brother, the sculptor Oded Halahmy. Oded has a loft in SoHo. In the past decade he has set up The Pomegranate Gallery and his Foundation for Art, promoting peace across the Middle East. Oded and all of his family were born in Baghdad and went into exile with almost the entire Jewish community in 1950. But Oded had never forgotten his roots. His gallery provides a venue for artists from Iraq, Iran and elsewhere in the Middle East
I baked a cake with a few of them almost immediately (to be shared here soon) and then the remaining lemons just sat in the bowl on the counter looking pretty for about a week. I couldn't decide what else to make, so until I came up with a plan, I decided to juice and zest every single remaining lemon. I poured the lemon juice into ice cube trays which went into my freezer along with the huge pile of zest - I think I'm all set for a while! :)
The old man jumps out from behind the door. “There you are!” A slap and a heavy thud as Hamid falls against the wall. “You filthy pig!”
I learned that love is never quiet. And is always expressed in everything you do.
First I will show you the photo for this month, and then I will try and explain what inspired me, because I can almost guarantee you won't be able to tell from my layout. ;)
And skulking about like a dodgy second-hand car dealer on “Watchdog” does nothing for the Catholic Church or the Cardinal himself. He will almost certainly go.
Okay…I’ll stop teasing you now! I just can’t help myself. Y’all are just so darn cute!
Then Jesus told his disciples a parable to show them that they should always pray and not give up. He said: “In a certain town there was a judge who neither feared God nor cared what people thought. And there was a widow in that town who kept coming to him with the plea, ‘Grant me justice against my adversary.’ “For some time he refused. But finally he said to himself, ‘Even though I don’t fear God or care what people think, yet because this widow keeps bothering me, I will see that she gets justice, so that she won’t eventually come and attack me!’” And the Lord said, “Listen to what the unjust judge says. And will not God bring about justice for his chosen ones, who cry out to him day and night? Will he keep putting them off? I tell you, he will see that they get justice, and quickly. However, when the Son of Man comes, will he find faith on the earth?”
1 sweet potato cut up
This is the FlyLo remix of their single "Wobegone", and I think you'll agree it is quite tasty. For more info on The Long Lost I suggest you check out their myspace.
Sources: Wikipedia, youtube, imdb.com, nmdb.com
"It pays for my Gray Coach ticket from London and a TV for the room and any little extra's, you know? But they held me over for a day and Gray Coach charge a fifteen dollar fee to transfer the ticket to a new date and I've run out of money. That little bit of money I brought with me? So I was just wondering if Philip was in and could run down to the station and pay it for me. But if he took the Aruba flight, I guess that's not possible...
Someone to be so blatantly positive that you’ll want to shake them silly.
Dec 28th – It's 66 degrees here and George has on a sweater. I'm not joking.
Was Adlestrop -- only the name
Would you like me to set you on this donkey?
Whenever the word ‘Wintersteiger’ was entered into the Google search engine for the ‘.de’ top-level domain, an advertising link with the heading ‘Advertisement’ appeared on the right-hand side of the page in addition to a link to Wintersteiger’s website. The text of the advertisement included expressions such as the following: ‘ski workshop accessories’, ‘ski and snowboard tools’, and ‘maintenance and repair’. Clicking on the advertising link directed the user to a section of the Products 4U website entitled ‘Wintersteiger Accessories’.
Love is a preexisting condition.
And what do most of us do in that explosive state? We yell. We scream. We say vehement, horrible words and sometimes hurt people that have nothings to do with what it is we are really angry about.
Preheat your oven to 350 degrees, and grease a baking sheet.
Roger Kieschnick SFG C 20
Kenneth A. Jonsson
At our annual Hooking Retreat this year we put on a show of the Grain Elevator Rugs that will be touring Saskatchewan for the next three years...the first Gallery show will take place at the Regina Legislature Building.
C) Mr. and Mrs. Jane and John Doe
It’s easy to respond, “All my life,” but that’s not quite true. I didn’t start writing with the intent to publish until about five years ago. Sure, I’d written some full-length stories that will never see the light of day, but those were really more for me than anything else. Now, I write for my fans.
I have been pondering this for a few days, as I have been unsure which program to follow this time round. I had been thinking I might like to try the Lean & Strong round, but have come to the conclusion that there is a bit of mid-section flabbiness that I would really like to work off first - you know the usual spots us ladies have trouble with, the tummy/hips/thigh region. Also, I have really only just started doing some running on a regular basis in the last month, I want to see how I go with that for a while longer, as I hope to increase my cardio fitness, reduce my run times, and get an improved, more efficient technique happening. So, it is Lean & Fit again for me, and I am going to push myself to the advanced level. I am not quite in the advanced level for my push ups etc, but the rest is fine.
3. Bake the onions for 15 minutes. Then mix them around and bake them for another 10 minutes (until soft).
Hughes semi retired after one of his many muses, John Candy, suddenly passed away in 1994. He felt a piece of creativity leave him when Candy died and we all lost out because of it but he held true to creative integrity not forcing something that wasn’t there and making money and movies just because of who he was and the fact that he could.
I am furious. I am hurt. I am currently unforgiving. Those are the things that have me LOST. The forgiving will be hard for me. Hopefully, it will come. I know God tells me to.
Very likely, I valued myself as much or as little as many girls in my position that were battling self-esteem issues. I never thought or felt that I was pretty enough, thin enough, smart enough or in general good enough. Period.
So we're on round 3 or 4 of trying to wean. He hasn't ask, nor have I offered since the 3rd. I take that back, he did ask today but I said nope, they aren't his anymore. He moved on like it was nothing. So now if I can get through the drying process all will be well. :)
This guy would have been absolutely bonkers with all the people, so he had to go lay sod at my brother's house with the guys. Hehehe. I'll admit it--I like to think my dog is a person.
something with snaps already attached as a reference
The building of so many cities in a relatively short time could only have been achieved by a large workforce who were supervised by masters of the various building trades. In other words, a few white masters and many black slaves, --- exactly like South Africa was built in the ‘apartheid’ era! The only difference between the South African apartheid era and the Sumerian era is that Sumerians flourished for 3000 years, while ‘apartheid’ only lasted for a mere 46 years.
Today started out smoothly enough. I fed him, I let him see his mother off (because he usually behaves when he sees for himself that she’s not in the house), and when he got fussy I put him to bed. Everything was good until he awoke from his nap earlier than he should have. Right away, Benjamin went to crying. No problem. I changed his diaper and that should have been the end of that. It wasn’t time for him to eat so he should have been good, but Benjamin kept crying. His mother usually rocks him and walks around with him so I decided to try that. It worked for a little while and I was feeling good about myself, but then Benjamin resumed his crying which escalated to screaming.
DAD: Well, I'm a little hurt that when you got your Real Estate License you went to someone else's class. Mind if I ask where you went?
Fried rice drop noodles ($8) are best eaten in the traditional Khmer style, cooked with beef, bean sprouts, garlic chives and topped with a fried egg. And it’s hard to resist chomping down a plate of deep-fried quail ($10), marinated and fried to a bone-crunching brown.
You bitch about America at the protests, where our police handle you with kid gloves. You pose like little anarchist douchebags in your Guy Fawkes masks (my GOD! These people are ignorant of history!) throw bricks at the cops and destroy other people’s property, and then scream and cry about your civil rights being violated, all while demanding to be more like other countries that would just machinegun you in the streets and be done with it.
We lucked out and got a reservation at the last minute, but if you want to check this place out I highly recommend calling ahead of time! There are three menus available at n/naka, the Chefs Tasting Menu, the Modern Kaiseki and the Vegetarian Tasting. We went with the Chef’s Tasting along with the wine pairing. The Chef’s Tasting is a 10 course meal, the staff is amazing and walks you through each course and how each wine selection complements each dish. Here were some of my favorites!
Me: Noah's Ark?
I'm on my 2nd revision of my NaNo '10 novel and it's going really well so far. So far... good feedback from some fantastic CP's and Betas! All have said this is the one to query. *bites nails* I hope to be complete with this revision in a month or so. Ha.
ZoneAlarm Free Antivirus + Firewall – Need a free security suite? ZoneAlarm Free Antivirus + Firewall combines excellent personal firewall protection with good malware blocking. But it may have trouble cleaning up a badly infested PC.
When you are querying, you just want an agent. When you get an agent, you just want a book deal. Once you have the book deal, you want your editorial letter. You’re anxious to move into revisions, and line edits, and copy edits, and cover art, and ARCs, and marketing, and tours, and reviews, and seeing your book on a store shelf. And then you want to sell the next novel, and the next, and repeat the process all over again.
But a marriage is something quite different: not a disposable consumer item at all, but rather a hand-crafted, exquisite object. It is a tool for life. It is a long-term investment, of both time and money, and like all handcrafted and exquisite objects, it requires maintenance to keep it in perfect running order.
“Like you don’t know, the god damn principal of North Central high school. He was the one who got me into this shit before I graduated. You know, I was a damn good student before this. Could a graduated from UGA already.”
I'm pretty excited.
waking up early in the morning usually isn’t my thing. i’m more of a *night owl* myself && would much prefer to keep the sleeping schedule of a vampire rather than wake up at ungodly hours in the morning. but when i do get to sleep at a decent time and wake up bright ‘n’ early, i realize that mornings aren’t so bad after all…
01. Shanda Lea 1 (3:33)
I am 65 years old and I have finally come of age! I have been retired for 5 years, was fortunate to retire early and before the stock market went south. I have a 22+ year federal retirement, with health care partially paid for; I still have to pay $245 per MONTH for my health care that does includes that I pay a rather high co-pay for visits, tests, and meds. I do NOT have any dental or eye coverage so I have to pay about $400 for glasses every 3 years and last year I paid $2,000 for extractions and an upper denture; but it could be worst. My meds are about $150 per month; yes I do have medical conditions, like everyone. I also have several ‘preventive’ health programs that I subscribe to that the insurance DOES NOT pay, which means I pay for them…acupucture, colon therapy, yoga, massage…on average about $100 per month, but it keeps my health on a high note.
Corn flour and water mixture as gravy thickener
I have to go in today to the doctor's office and pick up my letter for work, and get my 1st Hep-B injection (again) and the second TB test for the step two. Then my health & safety paperwork is complete for school at least and that is one more thing to check off my to do list.
Marion Bockelmann This is easy: I´d love to try sewing and using metals. I love both techniques when I´m looking at other artists´ work but I just don´t have the equipment and/or skills to do that. But I love the idea that there are things to explore in the future.
02. Honky Tonk Women
GHOSTLY VOICE (materializing into more solid form): Secret Service?! Nonsense. In my day, I kept a Winchester under my bed. And of course, Eleanor was a VERY light sleeper.
1/2 cup natural sugar
You can see it in my eyes
application integration (EAI), often tended to encourage vendor lock-in, as it is generally easy to integrate applications that are built
On a brighter note:
Get an copy-right free sihouette image from the Internet that you like that is related Valentine's day.This could be a dancing couple, or a man on his knees declaring his love, whatever you like
Hmm… relationships. That rite of passage into adulthood.
And know that in the big scheme of things, the pursuit of squirrel is much more important than the catching of it.
I’ve always liked to plan parties.
Had Satan known the purpose of the cross, would he have arranged to have Jesus nailed to the cross? He was not one of the initiated and never will be. That is why so many fail to understand the gospel of God’s grace. This same Evil One has blinded the minds of those that believe not. That is what is written in 2 Corinthians 4:3-4.
With the advent of the depression, the easy years of the roaring 20’s ended, as did prohibition and Tammany Hall’s control of the City’s politics. The election of Mayor Fiorello LaGuardia as an anti-Tammany reformer significantly cut off the Tammany organization from patronage jobs and power for 12 long years during which it went through a kind of interregnum of succeeding leaders. The end of prohibition and the legalization of the sale of liquor eliminated the liquor trade so that some of the criminal organizations ultimately would seek other illicit activities such as loan sharking, labor racketeering, drugs and later pornography. One of the few growth areas for Hell’s Kitchen employment became the West side docks, which were controlled in the 1940’s by corrupt union leaders o the so-called “pistol local” With the death of Charles McManus political control of district leadership in Hell’s Kitchen passed to Michael Kennedy, a former Congressman. There were in this period recurrent rumors of mob influence in Tammany Hall. In fact in this period Michael Kennedy in 1942 became the leader of Tammany Hall, but then was deposed when Thomas Aurelio one of his prominent candidates for state supreme court judge was recorded as thanking the mobster Frank Costello for his nomination and promising him whatever he needed.
Uh, oh…
Brooklyn Brewery Winter Ale
With Miguel Cabrera moving to third and doing reasonably well defensively, the Tigers having a player in Triple-A, Danny Worth, who fits what they need much better in a utility infielder role, Inge looking lost at second base and, for he most part at the plate, the handwriting was on the wall.
"Hey, do you want to learn pilates?"
I had a video Skype session with Ram Dass a few years ago, a service called a “Heart-to-Heart” that he makes available to his website subscribers. My agenda in setting up the conversation was to ask him for his blessing before I set out on a book tour to promote a memoir that featured my history with him in the first and last chapters, symmetrically framing the whole work. And though I had badgered him repeatedly the previous year, in the end he had opted not to endorse the back of my book. So now, if I couldn’t get his blurb, I felt I at least needed his blessing. He paused a moment when I asked, closed his eyes to search for his answer, then looking straight into the camera and pointing his finger, said very calmly, “You have my blessing, as long as you tell the truth.”
While rooting in the craft room yesterday to find some fimo for my card set - i found an unused , unopened Joanna Sheen Stamp ! I thought maybe one of my lovely followers might like it - So if you do then please just add your name on the comments box below and il shall draw a comment at random to win it ..
Craft beer is an inherently social beverage, and it should be treated as such. It is to be shared and enjoyed among comrades, exchanging opinions about the tastes and discoveries of the flavors. It is not meant to be consumed apart from the group but instead as part of the group. Conversation enhances the enjoyment and appreciation of craft beer, not ignoring others to scribble meaningless notes in a futile competition.
I'll explain more about the hair care products I use and swear by now in another post.
This is kind of my "girlie, fru-fru" tree.
FXXX me.
It's that time of the year again - August/September marks the beginning of the summer research season in Antarctica. The annual migration has started. Originally 'destined' to accompany my old team of scientists and ice divers down to New Harbor field camp this coming season, I will not in fact be going South this year. I will be staying home instead - and it feels right so. The resonances from previous seasons will endure for a lifetime. Besides, I can't help feeling increasingly conflicted by our presence in Antarctica. . . (Would I stand by that statement had I never been there? Or if circumstances were different this year? All things considered, yes, I believe I would.)
Writing from SUNY Binghamton and her MFA in Poetry from Sarah Lawrence College. She has contributed to the BOMB Magazine and Best American Poetry blogs and reviewed poetry for The Rumpus. Her poems have appeared or are forthcoming in Barrow Street, Contemporary Verse 2, Cream City Review, The Paterson Literary Review, Magma Poetry, and elsewhere. She blogs at iammyownheroine.wordpress.com and is the host and curator of
The folks at Truth have a very difficult time understanding that smokers are not smokers because tobacco executives beat them in a one-on-one debate. They're smokers because smoking feels good and the chemicals in them are physically addictive. Glass Pops, they do not feel good, and they are about as addictive as under-nail bamboo skewers. The entire ad is based on a deductive fallacy as elementary as "Adnoxious is a web site. Epicurious is a web site. Adnoxious can provide me with a tasty yet wholesome citrus quinoa recipe for my next garden party."
Artwork: The artwork in the bedroom is by Elliotte Puckette and Grace Slick. The “underpants” print in the bathroom is by Hugo Guiness. There are a number of works from friends, family and teachers. Fitzhugh made the white sculpture above the fireplace. We make frames for maps and objects that we find as well.
I was determined to find some bulbs, which wasn't so easy this late in the season. The folks at the nursery where I bought them assured me that they will do just fine since they have been kept outdoors in the cold, so I snapped up a package of 4. I will plant the extra one in the ground and we'll see who wins the race to bloom, the 3 in the vases or the one that gets to snuggle into late winter soil.
Album: Live Blood
Besides being good for a much needed laugh in the middle of a 14 hour shift, it also got me thinking and reminded me of my own personal motto:
This story is run-for-your-life paced and really got my adrenaline pumping. There is a little Aztec Mythology as a great twist and no, that's not really a spoiler.
Since I got home from The Bead Cruise, I have been trying to decide just how to unload all my cruising adventures on y'all in a way that 1)doesn't bore you, 2)gives you an idea of just what an amazing experience it was, 3)doesn't drag talking about the cruise into next month, and 4)shows you the most images possible without slowing your computer screen loading times to a complete crawl. Um, really now, I took about 1000 photos. Quite frankly, I don't have the time to edit them all and I know you don't have the time to view them all.
5. You won’t see or speak to your neighbor for the next five months. A former neighbor was expecting, gave birth, and had a boy in a stroller in spring. I said, “And who is this little critter with your son, X?” “Oh, that’s my son Y, he’s four months old.” Yes, an embarrassing little episode in the life of the Last Frontier Gardener. I had no idea because it all occurred during the winter. No, we don’t linger outside and visit. A quick dash to the mailbox or grudging bout of shoveling about covers it.
Mission Special Rules:
14. The Horrors “Still Life”
06. The Meaning
The variables affecting this decrease included the predictable factors of delivery by skilled attendants, complementary nutrition for pregnant women and their children in the primary care clinics and schools, clean facilities, and fertility. But the most important factor and the one which increased the effect of all others was the educational level of women. For every additional year of maternal education there was a corresponding decrease in the MMR of 29.3 per 100,000 live births.
Go with the Flow. Action in Harmony with the Tao and no action beyond that.
Lord, thank You for the four blessings You have given us to raise. Please help us teach them that while we are all part of a greater family in You, their first and best friends are the siblings with which You blessed them. Please grant them hearts that are humble and forgiving towards all people, but most especially towards each other — and please, Lord, grant my husband and I the grace to show them, daily, what mercy, humility, and love look like in action. Keep us mindful that no one of us is greater than any other in Your sight, and that to believe otherwise is to make the grounds of our souls fertile land for the seeds of envy, wrath, and pride, all of which serve to separate us from each other and from You.
The shoulders/straps on this pattern are very wide-set. This may be great for certain body types, but not for me. I can only imagine that Burda was going for a romantic, wide neckline to maybe show off some pretty collarbones or maybe a lovely necklace. For me, however, the wide neckline is unpractical- it would be necessary to wear a strapless bra, which I could do...
Way back in November, I joined the competition colloquially known as NaNoWriMo. Now some of you are going ‘Cool’. Some of you are going “I’ve heard of that, please tell me your going to explain what the hell it is.”. And still others are going “Huh? Wha? This is another post about writing isn’t – sigh”
“We emphasized on the differentiation. The song in itself has an imposing feeling, so we thought that the performance should be big and bold too. We practiced for around a month but that’s without counting the sleeping time and eating time, it’s really only dancing. When practicing and on stage too, Kai caught well the balance in the center.”(Suho)
I read a lot of Jacqueline Wilson to my partner’s daughter which she thoroughly enjoyed. But I also read her the beginning of Great Expectations and I saw her eyes grow wide. She was totally hooked. With young children so much depends on the adult and whether they transfer their love of story and whether they can bring stories to life.
He relished at the thought of me being helpless and being able to use me. He had his hands around my neck and I could feel his frustration and hate for me then he roughly shoved his fingers inside..After a few minutes my youngest daughter made an appearance and he backed away. He got my new battery and left.
So join me in raising a glass to the lowly blogger. May your laptop hold its charge and your spell check never fail.
In organization since 1974, Giordano’s is well-known for their pies stuffed with cheese. So they set out to make their personal double-crust pies. They’re topped with anything from sausage to shrimp. But it’s the stringy, chewy mozzarella you’ll keep in mind.
I'm not quite sure how I missed The Angry Snowmans the first time around two years ago when they released their first album full of Christmas joy, especially considering my annual search for cool and unusual holiday music for the CD mix I make for friends each year, but I did. My bad; my head is hung by the chimney in shame.
It National Crochet Month (or International Crochet Month, perhaps?) so I've been featuring crochet, but I've discovered some gorgeous Spring sweaters in my Columbia books from the 1930's and I don't think I can wait until April to show them to you!
Anyhow, it's a Monday, and I have another fabulous giveaway for you! And this one is just in time for Mother's Day! You can treat yourself, or show your own mother some pampering with a gift from Scentsy!
So to say that Burke and those like him reflexively oppose ALL change is nothing more than lying Leftist propaganda. It is often noted (e.g. by Owen Harries) that Burke said: "A state without the means of some change is without the means of its conservation." As Harries goes on to say, "so the issue was not reform versus no reform; it was between the view that reform was a simple matter that could be engaged in sweepingly and the view that it required prudence and was best approached incrementally". So conservatives have NEVER opposed change per se and it is little more than a calumny to say that they do. A careful and cautious approach to change certainly characterizes conservatives but opposition to change does not.
“I wanted to see if he was really psychic. You see if he was psychic he wouldn’t have come when I called.”
Cole Porter’s, “DeLovely”
Remove from oven, reduce heat to 275 degrees.
Here’s a CT layout by Jessie:
2 – Can I play your phone?
So, the dilemma always remains- how do I make sure I cater to everyone’s needs?
When I really sat down and looked at the debt and what I had purchased I could see exactly what I have done and why it has been so easy not to spend money or use credit cards since our split…
Brought to You By the Republican Party: Mitt Romney, former CEO of Bain & Company, co-founder of Bain Capital, ex-Governor of Massachusetts, and current front-runner in the GOP race.
I have started adding a bit of oil to all my cakes and brownies as it makes them more fudgy and moist.
"Spiritual resurrection? What do you mean?"
I have bought cheap packages of underwear, rolled them up tight into a zip-loc bag, and then thrown away a pair every day so
Whatever happens ‘Geech’ will be remembered more for his successes than failures, but he was unable to get Bath consistently finding a fluent style to their game that prevented them from building any momentum.
cowslip:..A small herb with golden-yellow flowers.
Today, as we draw ever closer to that transcendental object at the end of time, TOATEOT, Humanity represents the cutting edge of complexity. The whole process is one of moving towards complexification, his Novelty; our Fusion as one Consciousness; the Omega Point.
The backgrounds of both the pages were done using the airbrush attachment for the markers. and the doodles and text was also done using copics. It never ceases to amaze me what you can do with a set of markers.
Year-over-year, asking prices rose 0.2 percent.
This article in the nyt last month makes a good argument as to one cause. Agricultural subsidies are primarily directed towards a few crops, including corn and soybeans. This makes the goods derived from these crops, such as high fructose corn syrup, cheaper, while making other produce, such as carrots, oranges, etc more expensive. This means that healthier food ends up being a luxury good.
"Call Nat."
The recipe did suggest that it took a little effort and I would agree. Mostly the filling took the most time and I don’t have a very big star nozzle for my piping bag so the piping also took a while. Other than that, on their own they were really easy to make. Recipe in May’s Olive magazine and I’m sure will be on Good Food website soon (it’s too long to write here!).
Next we have an image from Matthew Felton all the way from Seattle, in Washington state. Matthew fitted in a trip to pick up his medal with a visit to the UK for some family celebrations. His Image Jawarren and Zaya is a lovely portrait of a father and his child. Jawarren was an american football player, and then a member of 4x400 mens relay team for the USA in 2000. I'm not usually a fan of tattoos but I think they work very well here.
Monday, March 21 - Myer Horowitz Theater - Edmonton, ALB
~ Self-confidence in times of trouble.
I am just frustrated because I want to get this business going in the right direction and it feels like it’s not.
Take for instance the story that just hit news in our area about the local duck hunter who went hunting with his dog. The story is way too good to keep quiet. I feel for the guy, but I will be laughing about this for months. I didn’t think anything could beat the story of my brother fishing with his son that ended with them at the doctor’s office. Seems as though when my nephew cast his line, he caught something a little bigger than he was expecting. That would be his father….The hook went into my brother’s nose. I am still laughing at that one, but to the story:
- The importance of copyright to society
Rubin
Oh yes, the prominent display of Ms. Wearstlers bosoms in Playboy. I'm all for fabulous females embracing their beauty and being proud of their figures - but not so a man can sit there and pretend to read the articles. (I love that they think we buy this).
__Among the various in form, setting and technique of jewellery production of one of the mightiest states of the medieval Europe – the Kyiv Rus (9th-13th cent.) a special place is occupied by the decorations executed in the technique of cloisonn? enamel. These are such details of princely dressing, as pendants for the womanish head-dress – colts, diadems, barmy adornment, executed to the individual order without any copy. Multicoloured enamels combined with images full of sacred sense draw the attention of visitors.
The most important thing to do when writing Chapter One is put your best material out there. Do not humbly introduce your story—present it with a flourish. Don’t hold back! Set your tone and own it. You’re going to write a whole book using great material; have confidence that you can generate terrific ideas for action and emotion whenever you want.
List of Participants:
doesn't explain anything
Happy writing,
The course is run by Medway Adult and Community Learning Service and starts on Thursday, 3 May from 7-9pm at the Rochester Centre at Eastgate.
Before we moved to this area, 6 years ago, we lived up in the Central Belt of Scotland. The nearest cinema was the Allan Park in Stirling, but that wasn’t much of an improvement on Dumfries, so we used to regularly go down to Cineworld in Falkirk – a 12 screen multiplex with large, comfy seats, huge screens, great sound and toilets where you didn’t feel you needed to be scrubbed clean with a wire brush after using them. We used to go there at least 2 or 3 times a month.
Oh and by the way--Ben and Patty are part of our group. They're gun-owners and patriots. They're traditional parents. They had guns before they had children, and guess what? When they started a family, they didn't give up the guns "for the children's safety."
Sautéed scallops, angel hair pasta, asparagus, dinner rolls
Still it’s quite nostalgic to reminisce these icons, knowing that its only a swift aroma of their presence that lingers on in our lives…
Pudhina
Now for the best part - the giveaway! One lucky person will win their own free copy of the My Memories Suite software. I will draw a lucky winner on September 10th. In order to be entered in the drawing please do one or more of the following:
Have you noticed the rightwing noise machine references the First Amendment every time one of their own says something repulsive? As a defense for ignorant speech being called to task by society, freedom of speech gets pulled out of the little grab bag of tricks by the lineup.
Tropical Storms
Stay tuned for a update on my Crazylegs experience this past weekend!
All in all, a wonderful time professionally, romantically, emotionally and spiritually.
My Puppy Went for my shoes (first and last time that will ever happen-they have since been moved)
And he revealed that as we get older, we also appear to become more moral. ‘What stood out from the answers was that obedience decreased with age, while reason increased – a logical occurrence as we make the transition from youth to experience,’ he added.
LOPEZ: Thank you, Wolf. I’m joined now by Elizabeth Cuevas- Neunder. She is the CEO and founder of the Puerto Rican Chamber of Commerce in Florida. She is based out of Tampa.
TY: Are you working on any other book ideas?
starfish to Orion
“You two beat it, then,” the tracker waved his hand in the direction opposite the hospital.
Today it's work in the office (for my husband's business), maybe lunch with a friend whose birthday is tomorrow (but she just became a grandmother for the second time last night - so maybe not), and enjoy the 80 degree weather today.
Maybe, when this wedding is over and done with, I could begin a new career–I could become a wedding-planner and help other brides-to-be realize their dreams. Or maybe not.
(everything)
In any school of Wisdom and knowledge it was customary to introduce to the disciples first the “Minor Mysteries” and then the “Major Mysteries”, where the emphasis was given around the authority of the teachings. Undoubtedly, modern Christianity has lost its mystical and esoteric teachings and its effects have been observed especially among more educated people. It is no surprise that many intelligent and highly ethical people have strayed from the churches because of the current teachings of the church, as they regard them as contrary to their sense of morals or an attempt against their intelligence.
The bully parent is PROUD when their kids bully school children. This shows the kids are learning the bully lessons correctly, and inherit bully status in town.
3 wan'
Do you remember a time you really wanted to do something or try something (that wasn’t life threatening. It was all you could think about and all you could concentrate on until you had it – until you tried it. When you did get it –what happened? After that it wasn’t that important anymore, that feeling of desperation left and in most cases the feeling transferred to something else.
Short version: they're Entombed, got very fat and very pissed off-- can't move quickly at all, weighs 300 pounds (136 kilograms to my European brothers and sisters, 21 1/2 stone to my Irish homies) and would squash you without even thinking twice about it, though probably wheezing through the whole endeavor.
4. My best friend and former college roommate Rebecca visited me for Easter! Whoop! This is her creepin' behind a bush at the top of a hike in Tent Rocks National Monument.
I do know a few things for sure:
Let me say here that I really appreciated the letter from Cricket. I think it’s very honest, not only in its rejection but in its highlighting what they liked about my book and their well-wishes. But I also feel it highlights quite well the divide between general literature and religious writing, and the sort of bemusement that goes with trying to either combine or separate the two.
Ladies, show us something we haven’t seen in some time, qualities that make a woman a good wife and mother, ones that differentiate you from other women.
As for quitting, Unschooling is not quitting. Unschooling is choosing to learn in the way we were designed. And you can quit employment. I have quit many jobs because they were toxic and interfered with what was most important to me, my family. Leaving certain financial securities hasn't been easy. I have worked harder at finding an employment situation that provides most closely the life that my family wants than if I had stayed miserable. And you can quit family it often seems more people do than don't. We have chosen to commit to family regardless of the challenges and there have been plenty. I completely agree that you can not decide you want something and then not work to get it. Radically unschooling is so much work. We have to be so much more present than before. We have to pay close attention to our children to support what they choose to learn without interfering or putting our own agendas in the way. I have been a teacher so this has been really hard for me. Instead of following traditional parenting strategies we now have to be amazingly present, calm, and supportive. Yelling is easy, time-out is easy, taking away privileges is easy, spanking is easy, I could go on but I think the point is made. I often work a split shift so I can be home at times during the day to support my kids. Sometimes I work 6 days a week in order to be more present and often 4 of the days start at 5:30 am and end between 6:30 and 9:30 p.m. Working a regular 9-5 job seems pretty easy in comparison.
However, the history of the name isn’t the only facet. iPhone is also easy to remember. Its nearly just phone, but with an “i” in front. It doesn’t get any simpler. And last but not least, it actually describes the device, in context. Consumers are aware of the type of device, hence the “Phone” part, and they know its made by Apple due to the “i” prefix.
In the 1930's, C.S. Lewis and J.R.R. Tolkien were dons together at Oxford. They were both Christians and both writers, and they met regularly with others to discuss various aspects of writing in a literary group called the Inklings. On one occasion, Lewis, Tolkien and another friend were up all night discussing Myth and its relation to Christianity. Tolkien and Lewis both loved ancient myths, particularly the Greek and Norse myths. But Lewis disapproved of Tolkien using myths in the books he was writing. He called them "lies breathed through silver" and suggested that a Christian shouldn't use so-called pagan stories.
“Not big enough for a gorilla,” I replied wistfully, “but it does look agreeably firm. A manual examination would allow me to give a more definitive opinion.”
My two-month old son had been ill and he and I had recently come home from a week in the hospital. I was exhausted and excessively worried so I kept checking on him while he slept. At one point I thought, “Lee! You have to stop worrying! Did you think he had turned into a little Monster Baby?” And I laughed at myself but then I thought what if he had? And that was the beginning.
I was a fan of Fleetwood Mac’s and the song Rhiannon released on their 1975 self-titled album. When I said Rhianna instead of Rhiannon, MJ corrected me about the song title.
And unlike the rest of the world with its two-faced, back-biting, sniping, catting, clawing, snarling envy, or its pathetic cowering, bowing, scraping, incessant smiling, dishonest hype - the Lion at least was real. And he was a king in his own way, a creature powerful in his own right, dangerous, a true killer, a mogul that lorded over the music scene of Emerald City like a un-named god. She felt it the moment they'd met, felt the moment he'd leaned up against her, felt it when he'd driven it into her, his purpose, his strength, his majesty. Oh, she had been sure she had the upper hand, that, as always, she would simply turn him into a puddle of drooling idiot with the flick of her wrist and sinister smile. He wanted to play, and she had the instruments, the experience, that dark light in her soul that loved to see them grovel and belittle themselves. But even after the whip, the name-calling, the burning, churning flames that seemed to engulf her when she inflicted glorious pain on another, he had surprised her, risen up, thrown her down and taken it all back. It was the only time she had even felt as if another creature was an equal, or greater than her. His majesty broke her in every way, in all the ways she'd longed to be broken, leaving her undone and exposed, suddenly vulnerable. The violence of his wild thrusting, the rake of his claws on her back and bottom, his hot breath on her neck - she was his in any way that he wished. If only he would growl his desires in her ear, she would obey.
The rapists were arrested after the CCTV footage was released to the media and Jallat’s school teacher recognised him. DNA was found on the victim that proved the identity of the rapists.
Addy definitely wants to sock it to All American Insurance Company where it hurts the most – their pocket. God knows they have cheated so many of her worthy clients over the years. Plus, teaching All American’s defense counsel a lesson or two would be an added bonus. He has pulled off too many undeserved victories in the courtroom – not to mention the bedroom. A big win for Addy would definitely put a stop to counsel’s soapbox about how jury trials are popularity contests, how Addy is naïve and how her clients are liars.
Which brings me to my exciting announcement... my daughter now has her own photo blog...
Cast: Todd Armstrong, Nancy Kovack, Gary Raymond, Laurence Naismith Dir: Don Chaffey C-104 mins, TV-PG
Fred plied his noise-maker enthusiastically and appropriately throughout the game. Occasionally he'd look over and smile at me, nodding and smacking his lips. During the first intermission, Fred opened a small backpack that has been lying near his feet. One by one he removed the contents, lifting each up and showing me the item; a large bar of chocolate, a pen, a pair of gloves, a knitted hat, and a small battered stuffed mouse. I smiled and made a thumbs-up sign, and then rummaged in my purse and showed him the apple I had secreted there. Fred grinned and then pretended to feed the bar of chocolate to the mouse, as his caregiver smiled indulgently.
Sunday, December 9th–I watched “Ragtime.”
The answer is simple and satisfying.
In some relationships, the condition is reversed. The neurotypical partner fully accepts that their partner has aspergers but the partner with aspergers can't accept the label. Unfortunately, if you can't even accept your own traits, then you won't be in a position to change them.
First up: the winner of the Office Christmas Bake-Off:
We’re really excited to have this new site which is now live, and proud to say that it is entirely free to use. No login is required but if Your British Pathé login details will still work just the same.
Build a Green Bakery
Yes, I will be there opening weekend of Breaking Dawn. Yes I am a hypocrite.
So not only is it not obligatory for self-publishers to edit “to professional standards”, I would say we should positively embrace not-editing, and where we find great art in the self-published ranks that’s full of flaws and fragility, rather than seeing what could be done if it was given a good polish (I’ll tell you what will happen – you will discover that inside every great book there’s a very good one waiting to get out), we should celebrate it as it is.
*Challenges: FTL172; ColourQ105
It's been way too long since I read a short story collection, but Cram's first book Radio Belly was a perfect reintroduction to the genre. It's a mix of quirky and serious, whimsical and sad and each story manages to be complete and satisfying on its own. While of course I had favourites, there wasn't a specific story that I would recommend skipping or that I didn't enjoy in some way.
She is the author of a book called Crown Heights and Weeksville that has some amazing photographs of this area from many years ago. She wrote the book because she did not know much about the history of the neighborhood and wanted to learn more. She even showed us where Crow Hill is really located on a map from 1842. She told us about the Crown Heights of the 1660s when the Dutch used to live there. If you want more information just open up her book about Crown Heights. It was very interesting to hear her own story about Crown Heights and the story of a larger history of Crown Heights. Thanks, Wilhelmena.
MP Consulting takes a look at how you can protect your great ideas and the value they have in your business.
All variations of the word. Too often my character feels something instead of it being shown. The many meanings I've used include: be aware of through touching or being touched, aware through physical sensations, find ones way by touch rather than sight, experience (a sensation or emotion), have the strength or energy to do or deal with, have a specified reaction, have compassion for, a sensation given by, and such.
Heat a dutch oven over medium heat with 1 tablespoon of butter. When melted, add the scallions, garlic, and ham. Saute for 3 minutes. Add the potatoes, water, bouillon, and pepper. Cover and crank up the heat to medium-high and bring to a boil. When boiling, reduce the heat and simmer for 12 minutes or until the potatoes are tender.
to understand mathematics better and better until it became his best subject,
The Pirates of Penzance
There's the door - nothing is stopping you.
I am most definitely a Pantser. I start with a general idea and let the story takes me wherever it chooses to. I’m merely an outlet for my muses to do their thing.
In April the Federal Communications Commission and the wireless industry announced creation of a stolen smartphone database, rendering stolen devices worthless and preventing thieves from reactivating the devices on other carriers (abcnews.com April 10). The wireless carriers’ databases may be completed within six months, but it could take 18 months to complete the integrated database across all carriers.
As for internal sabotage, it does not really matter. For example, Najib can choose to hold GE-13 in November or even in 2013. By then, those who lost in the Umno polls would already be forgotten entities, or harmless at any rate. What Najib must ensure is that he has the loyalty of those who win in the Umno polls, which is where his list of ‘winnable’ candidates kicks in. With the power to have the last say on who to field in GE-13, Najib can easily make certain that those who win office in the Umno polls will be ‘his men’.
Winner : My spicy chicken and any hoppy as fuck beer pairing.
Oh, and can you believe I have no family photos to share??!! Can't believe I haven't whipped that camera out for almost 2 weeks.... well, aside from this yesterday. I just couldn't resist. What holiday is complete without playdates and sugar?
Is this a cycle?
Also, my father is a scientist and I was given the gift of the questioning mind. If I couldn’t see it, then I didn’t believe it.
Whether you’re looking for a family outing, a fun activity to enjoy with friends, or even just to relax in the cold water, the Comal River is certainly worth visiting.
like the strange bay of an island
*finding new blogs that speak to me
Do the same as above, except check every couple of hours to make sure there is enough water, and halfway through cooking turn roast over. I had to add water to the gravy a couple of times.
Rational Dialogue: First, you aren’t fat. You are a normal size. That person is a normal size for their body (and if they aren’t then they need help). Second, you have been the smallest one in the room and that only lead to Laureate, a tube up your nose and stuck in a wheelchair for two months. Third, eat your damn food.
Sugars 1.3 g
The "Top 3" chosen by the DT this week and in no particular ortder, are as follows:
Luke 3:11 (New International Reader's Version)
With respect to the claim of the majority opinion that unless the emergency powers were made to end at the time the President made his report to Congress when it convened, it would be necessary to enact new legislation to repeal the act of delegation, in which case the period for the delegation would be unlimited, indefinite, and uncertain, contrary to the constitutional provision, I may say that the President was authorized by Act 671 to exercise emergency powers “during the existence of the emergency,” and not a day longer. To me that is a limited period in contemplation of the Constitution. There would be no need for a new law to repeal the Act of delegation, for said Act is self-liquidating. The moment the emergency ceases, the law itself automatically ceases to have force and effect, and the Presidential emergency powers also end with it.
I can tell he’s depressed because I am depressed. My aunt is manic depressive. ( in fact most of the women on my dad’s side is) I can never do anything right. He has it in his head that he has done everything on his own. He firmly believes that I have been of no help whatsoever.
And now on to today...
But there’s still more. Read Ex. 17:1-7. Just before the Amalekite attack, Israel is in a desperate state of health. The people are thirsty and nearly stone Moses because of it. The Amalekites choose this moment for their assault, when Israel was at its weakest. Indeed, the Israelites only escaped because of God’s direct intervention.
As my wife will tell you, beekeeping isn’t just a hobby, its a full time job. But its a job I love. I hope you’ll enjoy this record of my thoughts and experiences.
How to Protect Your Child from a Ferocious Beast (Gorilla, Sasquatch, Zombie…whatever!)
— Use the armored vehicles that are at your disposal.
and the path all along, to be the scattering of light,
Then I’d probably chuckle to myself and dismiss the notion, as Yakuza: Dead Souls has absolutely nothing in common with either of those games, aside from a host of undead creatures that need killing. The undead have invaded the streets of Japan’s famous red light district, and the well-dressed street gangs don’t take kindly to the intrusion. It’s the first Yakuza game to employ firearms (sometimes literally, as you can see in the screenshots), because kicking a zombie in the face is like asking for your foot to get bitten off.
I couldn’t believe that a rabbit showed up, right after my conversation. So, I stood very still and watched her.
Flip Flop is a story about the mechanics of time being changed, a theme that was dealt with very little in televised Who or in the New Adventure novels. We get to compare too quite different versions of the history of a planet.
I got lost in his baby blue eyes, his dimpled cheeks, and his loving smile.
as I prepare to functionally release miracle working power. I WILL NOT TOLERATE focus on SELFISH REACTIONS TOWARDS the Holy Spirit expressing themselves.
organizations); DMCA Conf. Rpt., 105–796, at 89–91; DMCA Section-by-Section
Also, if anyone knows where I can source a clear Edison filament globe with a screw fitting, please let me know (the pendant light just doesn't look quite right without it).
(If you’re about to argue that we humans generate all of our reality ourselves, please hang on to that thought for another time, because it’s s little off to the side of what I’m talking about here.)
The passengers went about their business while a girl among the special needs group retreated to safety behind closed eyes. Quietly hoping the dead would not set its sunken eyes upon her as it slowly climbed with light feet, three steps and around the corner. Tears slip through her clenched eye lids held like a vice, trembling lips reciting the lords prayer as the ghost from Matilda’s past made its way toward the vacated seat left by the giggling girls as it waited for Mattie's heart to beat its last. Mattie could smell the same soil she laid flowers upon fifty years ago mixed with the perfume she had given Greta for Christmas threatened to send Mattie over the edge finishing the job as quick as lickity split. Greta’s slow progression toward her seat ended three rows behind Mattie who could no more bring herself to look upon the injuries she had brought upon her lover then she could let go of Jack the intruders hand.
The second striking phrase in that prayer was the reference to the paschal festivities. I’m familiar with the Paschal Mystery – the passion, death, and resurrection of Jesus. I’ve never heard it referred to with the term “festivities,” though. I’ve heard the mass described not only as a sacrifice, but also as a celebration, but “festivities” seems to imply a much lighter atmosphere. Could it be that a nuance was lost in the translation?
bluhmirena@yahoo.com
Eberl's Large Trakehner with a new "do". Gave him a nice cresty neck with braids. I plan to paint him as a leopard Knabstrupper.
Living for the day wen
in order to cook further, again mix thoroughly the vegetables
~Danika Cooley
-Rinse your chard and cut off most of the stalk (leaving a little bit there for crunch factor). Cut your chard into 2-3 inch pieces and put in a bowl to be ready to add.
Related articles on this website
Well below your ego
Searing Shot
All I had to do was transcribe his words to have the column verbatim!
And this is one of the beauties of flash fiction: it enables you to try out a great variety of voice and form.
Happy Sunday evening!
Directed by Henry Selick. Written by Tim Burton and Michael McDowell
Visit every state
She texts me a few days later asking me to come back, she says she's suffering without me. I think she's just being dramatic, "She'll get over me," I think to myself. I feel horribly sad and miss her a lot, I think it's just because we were together for so long. I reassure myself that I made the right choice. "I'm not the right guy for her, I can't handle it," I think.
So, Day 1:
It's also helped me to realise that these last three weeks of no writing don't matter. I will catch up now that I have a new computer - the old one had a fatal illness. It's taken me a while to choose a new one and get it organised. One problem was I'd never de-fragged the old desktop so many files are in the wrong places. As Betty says, 'De-fragging doesn't sound like something a lady would ever do.' I didn't back up often enough either. Now I'm paying for it.
In today’s top story, Managing Editor Laura Devaney reports on what several experts had to say about planning successful mobile learning programs during an April 17 webinar from the Consortium for School Networking.
Here it is ...
Please RSVP to glenn@saskriverkeeper.ca
A symphony of emotion
"Do you like gym class?" I asked her.
"Actually," he said. "I think it would help if you were a bit smaller."
KRIS: Thanks.
Colouring: Copic Markers
After arresting Dube, police raided a pawnshop in central Joburg and arrested the owner, Brett Hutchings, who allegedly had some of the stolen jewellery in his pocket.
Draft will be ready for drinking within the next two weeks. New Year's Eve growlers? It's possible, folks. Here are the specs:
07 Changes
I never wanted all this tragedy
David was working late so my parents had me and the kids over for dinner.
….and so it is with the Weekly Photo Challenge here on WordPress. I try my best to look at every entry, I don’t always comment because there are just too many entries now to leave comments on every one. I do however use Zemanta and if it spots your blog as a related entry I will publish it. Anyway I digress. When I look at the entries for the photo challenge I often think how does that relate to the theme. Sometimes I see it as a very tenuous link, sometimes it’s glaringly obvious and sometimes I just don’t get it. No matter how many times I will look at the image.
Max’s article entitled “A display of the people’s spirit” was published in The Edge Daily, and marked an absolute departure from the other MSM’s tired script.
Alok Industries Ltd
Like most people, you’ve probably wanted to run your own dungeon at some time. Locking up your enemies, torturing them and maybe ordering a few executions is the kind of thing we all enjoy. But just how do you get started in the gruesome trade? You can nip along to the York Dungeon on Clifford Street and see how the professionals do it. They’ve got lots of experience of cruel and unnecessary torture, ghosts, plague, witches and various horrible blood-curdling nightmares to show you. You’ll soon get the hang of arbitrary justice and ghastly revenge. You might even get to dish some out, if you survive the ordeal.
Oldest and I ran up and down the line tossing clothes and pins in the basket, laughing as we went. Just in time. Moments later, the thunder clapped and lightening flashed. The house, once sunny and bright, dark like night.
Me: Mom, are you okay? I bow my head in shame as I listen to my mother weep.
Thank you so much Sussane Possing for them poem. I hope she will get to read and understand it one day.And a thank you, goes to all who sent me with comfort messages.
The MC5: Kick Out The Jams
Use all of the following colors:
Looks pretty good, right? Until you look closer. That pan has never seen the inside of an oven. Those peppers are raw. That's right. This is fucking staged. And you know why; because they took the first pan out of the oven, recoiled in horror, and called in a professional. You make this dish according to their recipe and the peppers come out all pale and squatty and freaky, the tomato soup on top burns black because it's full of corn syrup. Remember?
Jinn rewards them with all the money that doesn’t really exist, that is magic and proves to us their vacuous existence if you care to look. They are a RISC to us all, Reduced Instruction Set Counts. No wonder they are so shit at the arts and sciences. Everything they do is ugly. The haggard diseased mask of their unbeleif. They know not what they believe. They are nihilistic.
Ink: Versamark Watermark, Tim Holtz Distress Ink (Faded Jeans, Broken China, Bundled Sage, Antique Linen, Vintage Photo) by Ranger
This is another of the non-fiction covers that I really like.
I had a great day, though. We've been taking care of our neighbors' pets over the holiday, and they let Jesse's mom stay at their house while she was here. I went over early this morning to let the dogs out and make their bed, and was there when they came home, hours earlier than expected. I'd actually dreamed that they got home early, so it was a little eerie when they drove up. The girls had missed their daughter something fierce, and the three of them were inseparable for the remainder of the day.
New York DA Cyrus T. Vance did, it’s true, delay DSK’s return to France for no reason as yet apparent. But another NYC source in turn sticks to his belief that the NYPD ,Vance and the FBI were looking for some kind of sting against DSK throughout that period:
By Rick Snizek & Brian J. Lowney
There is often division among prolifers over methods, wording, attitudes etc...
I used 1915 for the top and the bottom. I love how sturdy Maja papers are. They are such high quality so you can use them for making boxes and other things that papers from a lot of other brands can't.
(Extended Exhalation) Staying relaxed with your breathing, begin to explore what it might be like to extend you exhalation or out breath, every 4th breath……..(this is Esther Myers style). … On your breaths between relax and let them be as natural as possible. As you extend your exhale, you may begin to notice that your belly draws back a little more at the end of the breath…….if you notice that you are in real need of air or almost gasping for air, on the following inhale, see about maybe lessening the duration or dept a wee bit, so it feels a little more natural and smooth…take some time with it, it might be a whole new feeling, so “feel it” and see what works well for you…In time see about finding an inhale breathe, following the extended exhale, that is natural and smooth, …it may possibly be lengthened as well…see what happens. Stay here a bit, with your breathing, and then when you feel ready to come back to natural breathing … and stay with it for a bit letting the breath practice’s effects sink in….See what you feel……. How do you feel? …and what do you or did you notice? …. There may be a feeling of overall balance in your body, greater awareness and clarity of thought, revitalized energy, moving fresh oxygen into your muscles, organs and cells, and may even help enhance mood , sleep and memory.
He may have been chairing the event but overseeing it was the 'massive headed brewing Overlords' from Magic Rock Brewing, Rich and Stu who were linked up via Skype to the event from their Huddersfield base and cast an imposing yet benign Orwellian shadow by dint of their huge faces being projected on to the screen behind the assembled panel. It provided much mirth and merriment for those watching it on the live feed and tracking it on twitter.
To celebrate out 6 months here in country I'm going to start a little feature called MEET MY. It's to let you get to know the people, things, and the area that we're living in. Hopefully this will help make this blog more personal about my Peace Corp service, so I can look back on it and remember these great moments.
-No pictures, except for the cover.
MOULDS
My very own, dear mother was attending the CCC reunion, too and, while I was imposing on my sister and her very patient husband, mom elected to roost at the hotel where the reunion was being held – with the potential for icy roads and the busy reunion schedule, I think that was a wise move on her part.
On one of their most recent visits, Grandma and Grandpa Willis gave Jack a transformer type toy. He just found it the other day when he dug out a bag to pack some toys for Maggie. Maggie got ahold of it later stating; "my tas-oder!"
In 1840 she was one of several American women chosen as delegates to the World’s Anti-Slavery Convention in London by the American Anti-Slavery Society & by other abolitionist groups. Arriving in England with her husband, she found the convention controlled by the rival American & Foreign Anti-Slavery Society -known to Garrisonians as the “New Organization”- & its opposite number, the British & Foreign Anti-Slavery Society, both opposed to public activity by women. Despite vigorous protests by Wendell Phillips & others, the American women delegates were refused recognition & assigned seats “behind the bar”. Though Lucretia Mott was thus deprived of a voice in the proceedings, she was nevertheless described by a friendly journalist as “the lioness of the Convention” (Liberator, Oct. 23, 1840, p. 170).
I will be hosting a blog hop on April
The best thing to ever happen for bronze-loving women (and men) the world over is most definitely self-tanner. While they are widely available at everywhere from the local drugstore to department stores, for your face it is important to use a better quality formula that will not clog pores or stain your skin. Philosophy makes fantastic gradual self-tanner that becomes deeper as the days go by with more use, which will create a gorgeous glowing tan. ST. Tropez who also has a great range of self-tanners has a fantastic product that can be used on your body or face for a golden glow. On it’s own it will create a deep color and when simply blended with a moisturizer it can add a slight golden sheen.
It is believed that Valmiki became a brahmarishi, by chanting Rama’s name… what wonderful thing will happen to our whole country then?
Here's the recipe - it comes from my cousin-in-law, but I've adjusted it a little.
So that is one major, previously terrible room completely organized and super functional. Now the only problem is that everything else seems so unbelievably disorganized in comparison. I see more Container Store trips in my future!
This, plus louder and louder “FUCK OFF!”s went on and on down High Street.
So, I have to accept that things are the way they are, I agree with that. Next, I need to accept the things I cannot change. As for the things I can change (it is within my power to send food to people who need it right now), I have to make choices about what I do, what I act on, and how I feel about those things.
What can I say? I just love purple, and if I lived alone in this house, every room would be some variation, be it orchid, eggplant, or something in between. To break it all up, there would be hits of varying shades of green, yellow, and pink. My daughter would be OK living in an all-purple house, but my stinky boys wouldn't. Boys... sigh.
My first foray into water buffalo mania took place on our way out to Halong Bay. Yes, the limestone mountains and the bay were all very impressive. But, I couldn’t keep my eyes off of the lumbering beasts of burden, like little chocolate flecks in the lime green shimmer of the rice paddies.
and I would bet over 90% of them blurt out Katarina Witt!
Alternate Catastrophe Screen
I was feeling I could touch the sky,now my ego has shrank.
seriously, all the struggle, friends calling to reserve a place in our house because we lived far from the beach. all of it for nothing.
During this Canadian election campaign, the Liberals and the NDP have been making lots of nonspecific promises about how their going to fix things that aren't broken in an increasingly desperate attempt to dislodge Stephen Harper from power.
Caramel-Filled Brownies
“Chapter Four: Nazis in the Desert” – p. 129 (NY’s “Midday Numbers,” 9/5).
The course itself is geared to the participants with many practical exercises, including getting them started and continuing writing their memoir, some lecture, but lots of time for them to talk about their memoir projects, ask questions and get a real discussion going. All five of us seemed to bond. And one participant sent me a thank you email afterwards.
However there seems to be a second type of Spiritual Gift. It is also “led” by God but in this case it is also fully empowered by God. For example, healing, prophecy, God given knowledge, miracles. These are “gifts” (given by God) that we have no way of doing by ourself. It seems that God gives these types of manifestations when He desires. However, that doesn’t mean we do not have any responsibility with these gifts. You ask, “How do I activate or flow in these gifts?”
WHO THE HELL IS THIS GUY?
Kin of all kings and all folk,
It’s the world’s most expensive teddy bear, with fur made of REAL GOLD with eyes of sapphires and diamonds! made by Steiff, who claims to have made the world’s first teddy bear, and was created to celebrate their 125th birthday. The mouth is solid gold, and the fur is gold thread. The pupils of the eyes are sapphires while the irises each contain 20 small diamonds. Only 125 of these collectible bears have been produced!
- Unintended Consequences of DOT Regulations Fee: Unintended Consequences of DOT Regulations Fee of $2.00 per one way travel per traveling customer applies to most reservations. No fee will apply to certain discount fares. No fee applies to bookings completed at Spirit Airlines’ airport locations.
The whole event took place in a giant hangar of a room, with one corner area walled off for the panels and cosplay parades, and the rest given over to dealers’ stalls and artists’ alley. There were two large empty areas, and no boards displaying the days’ events – you had to look in the programme for that information. It was OK, but not ideal. It all somehow seemed a bit shambolic.
So much for the claim some religionists make, that they are waiting innocently curious for Science to discover God. Science has already discovered the sort-of-godlike maker of humans - but it wasn't what the religionists wanted to hear. They were waiting for the discovery of their God, the highly specific God they want to be there. They shall wait forever, for the great discovery has already taken place, and the winner is Azathoth.
I started my weekly afternoons with Jake yesterday. On Mondays after school I'm picking him up and taking him to grab an ice cream or something. In order to earn his treat, he only has to ask me two questions.
Enjoy! Preserve Quality. Pat Peterson
While initially, it seemed like the most reasonable thing to do would be to “get this over with” and terminate the pregnancy, that notion quickly faded after about the third day. My initial argument of, “What difference does it make? The outcomes will most likely be the same – this baby will just die sooner rather than later,” was made null and void by a statement from my friend Maggie. She made the point, “Couldn’t the same be said of all of us? We’re ALL going to die sooner or later!” She’s right, and I KNOW this, but just needed that gentle reminder amidst my flurry of chaos. Just goes to show that you should never make a decision out of emotion — no matter what it is.
patterned paper: library ledger pack, scrap from my minds eye for butterfly
I have been putting in 60 to 68 hour weeks to make the the same amount of cash that I was making in 44 hours. Hopefully, with the return of the students, this will change. I have noticed a difference Friday night as well as Saturday night. This upcoming week actually, the whole month will be a busy one. We have frosh week, The exhibition, and then the harvest jazz and blues festival.
I take it back – maybe patterns don’t confuse men at all. Maybe men just see through them to the susceptible fashion victim underneath – and recognise that more straightforward styling choices reflect a stronger pattern of thought.
By 1788, through the use of aggressive legislation and criminal charges, the Bavarian Illuminati was apparently dissipated and destroyed by the government. While some see here the conclusion of the story of the Illuminati, one must not forget that the tentacles of Illuminism had the time to spread way beyond to confines of Bavaria to reach Masonic lodges across Europe. In other words, the Illuminati was never destroyed, it simply went underground. A year later, an important event would prove that Illuminism was more alive and potent then ever: the French Revolution.
Two days in a row of glorious sunshine. What perfect timing for the weekend.
One of the things I love about middle grade is that because middle graders are more...flexible...then YA readers, things don't need to be quite as developed. If this had been a YA, it would have been expected that the romance and friendships and the whole mermaid thing was more developed and realistic. But, it's MG and because of that, it works. The romance is kept light, the friendships are realistic, and the mermaid thing is done in a way that it's realistic enough.
Addison’s lips trembled and she couldn’t move, tears welling up in her eyes as she watched what was going on. Her eyes weren’t focused on Darien, they were focused entirely on Christian. She watched him whisper into the woman next to him’s ear, his closeness making the girl giddy and lick her lips in excitement. Instead of igniting anger at the sight of him with another woman, Addison’s jealousy brought her to tears. Her jaw was slightly agape, her bottom lip trembling furiously as her scared eyes opened wide, their surface wavering with forming tears.
My pillows! I always take my pillows with me on a road-trip (except of course when I fly). I’m really picky about sleeping on “used” pillows. I can’t help wondering who slept on the fluffy mound before me, whether they had clean hair or bad breath or whatever! And besides, no pillow can ever be quite as comfortable as my own. (Now you can see why I wouldn’t have made the trip west in a covered wagon–at least not without a great deal of complaining and whining!)
This season finale was epic and here’s why: every conflict of the season finally came to a head. Will and Peter, Will and Alicia, Will and the law (Grand Jury Investigation), Kalinda and her past, Alicia and Cary, Alicia and Peter, etc. Add in excellent camera work that really set the tone for the whole episode, and I think you’ve got one of the best episodes of the season. I’d like to take this moment to give a shout out to Graham Phillips and Makenzie Vega, who play Alicia and Peter’s children, for keeping up with all the great, more seasoned actors on the show. I especially love Graham Phillips, who plays Zach, I hope we get to see more of him next season!
Seek Truth and Report It
Game notes: That was an amazing session needless to say. Tracking the action in multiple directions was a challenge but the players were quite into the thrilling mayhem they caused. In the end they did the right thing, but in the process left the door open to play some of these troublemakers again someday.
I wonder... should I use the same frame on Mary Gibson?
The mother took the drastic step of having the stone smashed by her servants in the hopes that the mermaid would stay away. The mermaid then sang her vengeful intentions;
Of course, what is a blog if not hyper self aware, so I've decided to post the shitty, unfinished blog and let you all see a little bit of my process.
BTW - while I was driving south on the Turnpike I spotted a billboard with a picture of a cartoon sheep on it. I saw it about a minute too late and wasn't able to take in the whole thing, but I think it was an advertisement for a yarn store. Does anyone know of which billboard I speak or where said yarn-store might be? Anyone, want to take a road trip to find out?
This game is free, however it is only to be used for classroom and personal use. It may not be published on any websites or other electronic media, or distributed in newsletters, bulletins, or any other form or sold for profit.
The creations the Girls have made for you
Drink Diuretic Tea
Schedule:
These small folk I spend my days with teach me. Sure I teach them but some how I feel like I am a student in their lesson of how to be the best I can be.
Re messy houses, Dayna said that her mother's house was like a museum, but Dayna's is more like a "workshop of their interests"! It is NOT always perfectly tidy! She calls it the "love mess".
The appointment of Mike Fisher brought a number of long overdue changes to staff structure and a new focus on performance across the authority – a process continued by the current chief executive, Abdool Kara.
3) The court size is huge, 20×40 meters to be exact (larger than a basketball court).
your voice your body in the darkness of
Lori has updated her picture trail this past week with many delightfully prim goodies offered for sale. This sampler is one of her latest offerings. CLICK HERE to go see all her beautiful offerings.
What is a bad thing is expensive, small baby wipes. I go through a lot of them, but I always wondered if there was a better solution. And there is!
Well I’ve been without power since Saturday. Actually, the power just came back on to my house a few hours ago. Apparently the voltage from the town’s power station surged to 380V Saturday morning and should have tripped a main circuit breaker about a half a mile away from Wouram. The circuit breaker cuts off power to the Wouram hospital, and about 40 houses, mine included. Well, the circuit breaker did not do its job and the 380V continued to the hospital and every house it serves. As a result, a breaker at the hospital blew and started a small fire. No one was hurt and the damage was limited to just one room, but it caused quite a bit of a headache for the hospital’s technician who had to clean up the mess, and is still repairing the damage done. The hospital has power now though so I guess it’s mostly fixed. Luckily none of my electrical stuff was hurt since the power was cut off at the hospital when its circuit breaker blew, and caught on fire.
The next month, five mortgage servicers — Bank of America Corp., Wells Fargo & Co. (WFC), Citigroup Inc. (C), JPMorgan Chase & Co. and Ally Financial Inc. (ALLY) — reached a $25 billion settlement with federal officials and 49 states. The deal pays for mortgage relief for homeowners while settling claims against the servicers over foreclosure abuses. It didn’t resolve all claims, leaving the lenders exposed to further investigations into their mortgage operations by state and federal officials.
I wish the same for you. That you would find that peace and hope too. And that we can rejoice for all He has done for us, and all He is going to do.
"Almost There" - The Princess and the Frog
Work must be submitted in person on the days and times indicated in this prospectus. Work submitted by email must be done so BEFORE May 15. Artists may then be asked to bring in a work for further consideration during the open call submission period.
what other people think. There are a lot of people out there who do that, but they tend to get buried under the carpet."
November 12
McLennan, which is run by Jeffrey Greenberg, who was Jesuit-trained at
1 avenues
"Innerscope's precise, objective measurement of emotional engagement provides an unbiased look at the consumers' true emotional responses, so that more creative and cost-effective marketing decisions can be made."
Both of my friends who lost of left their jobs are now back in the workforce, with less pay, but more humanly working hours.
rectangle 2 layer
2/3 cup white sugar
Predictably Walker’s campaign is focused on the fact that our state’s overall unemployment rate continues to fall and there were 17,000 jobs created in January and February. But the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics says that Wisconsin lost 23,900 jobs from March 2011 to March 2012, the worst in the country. By far.
With that done, all they had to do was wait. Rel took Willer’s place behind the pillar furthest from the door - the scrawny guard slouched out, doing an excellent impression of a bored guard making the rounds - and tried to focus on keeping his legs awake without moving. The only sound was the clunk of the clock’s minute hand. Rel tried counting the minutes in his head, but lost track around... six? Seven?
At compound interest of cent per cent.
Disk 5
And also my friend Niki. She had her flaws, but I love her and miss her dearly!
I took a step toward the restaurant but then I heard in my mind the sound of a .22 bullet turning a rotten apple into instant rotten apple juice. It was a lot more dramatic than eating a burger. The door to the restaurant closed escorting the smell of cooking hamburgers back inside like an usher.
Afghanistan also prohibits homosexual activity, and the same report found that authorities “sporadically” enforced the prohibition.
Vegetarian mock pork meat
Panic in Peeblesshire
I just got back from lunch buying Jillian Michael’s Ripped in 30 DVD. I’ll be starting that tonight after walking another 3 miles! Marking my calendar as we speak with a big ol’ #1 for my 30 days. Lets see how well this works.
I'm Edna I have been with CCI from the very beginning of it's release when the Cricut Imagine was born LOL!! this site was created by none other then Tammy Skinner. You all know and love her from her other site Creative Critterz, she does alot of work with many tools from Provo Craft as one of the Hello Thursday Gals.
A. Coming into The Times already knowing how a newsroom works and what kinds of stories make for high interest really helped me find my footing quickly. Because I’m speaking with producers and reporters constantly, I hear industry jargon all the time, and I’m able to keep up despite not having previously worked in a newsroom thanks to my time in the j-school.
they could carry on their backs. They could camp almost anywhere, bathe in
That's it. Over and out.
Some other posts to read...
After a while, though, you start to see aspects of their real personalities shine through, like a thundercloud behind the sun.
Now, family and friends don’t start getting concerned at my current psyche. I’m not trying to be dramatic, and I am not hopeless, just concerned. All I can do is put in the time and effort for God to open some doors and guide us through the right one. I just ask for your prayers that He’s with us on this one and we do what is right. Brett and I have decided that whatever happens, we are leaving the country July 1st. Hopefully with Peace Corps, but I am coming around the ideas of different options. Just the other day Brett found this PERFECT opening with Invisible Children… I would love to go to Uganda :)
"RUN!"
Three distinct types of computer games are being made today - these are three distinct genres.
All the characteristics ascribed by NRK’s scribes to GoV readers should therefore not be taken for factual allegations or even probabilistic statements based on professionally conducted polling. They are a fog of sputum droplets sprayed by mentally handicapped people in an automatic reptilian brain reflex action that has bypassed the rational mind completely.
nothing he can do about it.
Supervisors who experience high levels of stress often take their frustrations out on those below them, but a new study finds that regular exercise could help combat stress and in turn reduce the incidence of employee abuse.
I'm going to have to brew something this weekend. Just don't know what yet. I'm on a Bock kick lately, so I'm leaning towards a Maibock this time.
Frattarelli JL, Moore GR. Workplace hazards during pregnancy. Prim Care Update for OB/GYNS 1998; 5: 54-59.
Here they are in situ, ready to be voiced and tuned.
These are all gifts God has already given me today, and I haven’t even technically begun my day.
Just got home from Swedish and Visiting Mary,,,,,,aka,,,,, "Bunnie." You know how you know someone for a while, then- meet their family and they have a nickname you've never heard before? Mary's family and Childhood friends Still call her Bunny............
Now, by my sceptre and my soul to boot,
There was a fifth requirement: complete the layout in two hours or less. I guess I'm benefitting from all the layouts I've completed so far this month, because I started the layout at 4:20 and finished at 5:27! I never scrap that fast, so this was quite an accomplishment for me. If anyone wants to play along with the challenge, it ends Wednesday night, so you have one more day to participate.
Security Summit in Seoul.
Anyway, I eavesdropped that it might be opening in about a month. As a venue for Flo's cabaret show. Flo will appear Wednesdays, Fridays and Saturdays, while still making Sunday gigs at Tootsie’s, 1818 Main St. They plan other shows Tuesdays and Thursdays, along with Happy Hour offerings.
and concentrated is unique (and will require a patent).
Tomorrow I take off to Chicago for an international convention for work. It should be a good trip, but I have been running a lot the last couple of weeks, so I'll definitely be ready for the running to be over when I come back wednesday night and I'll be ready for a relaxing weekend next weekend when Ry is at her dad's (once again, one of those nice benefits to shared parenting). Rylee's actual birthday is Friday the 4, so I'll be working from home that day and spending some time with her.
wakeUPgirl.com is a new media company that provides cutting-edge resources and training programs that bridge the gap between dynamic women in leadership and the everyday woman looking to fulfill her purpose. For more information, please visit www.wakeupgirl.com.
they were also important for Harryhausen himself: Beast
*** I have decided that I really enjoyed putting together my flashback blog, especially the posts regarding the musical artists of the 70′s and 80′s, and have decided to keep that blog alive….by transferring its posts to my main blog…..one musical act at a time. Fear not, I will still do my usual goofy comedy blogs, intermixed with the occasional delusional political rant, non-stop complaining and whining about my physical health, and the ever-so-rare serious post or two, while I sneak these music posts onto the blog each evening. I really love music and will listen to almost anything that is out there. I really loved the music of the 70′s and 80′s and my flashback blog was a way for me to revisit a bunch of the great music and artists of that time frame. These music flashbacks will hopefully take those of you my age back to some fond memories. For those of you that are young, chances are you may have not heard of some of these artists. I’ll post a different musical flashback each evening until all the posts off my flashback blog have been transferred. Once I have them done, ya’ll can help me make a list of all the great artists I have yet to get to from that era. Why am I transferring these instead of just resuming blogging on my flashback blog? Well, to tell the truth….I’m lazy. I want to do both blogs but I don’t want to bounce back and forth any more than you want to bounce back and forth by adding yet another blog to your reading. So…on with the posts….. and first up….
Thou shalt now 'grab' thine bag; rather than carry it. Bags shall be bijou to allow for clutching at the breast; or crumpled and held away from the body as if disposing of an offending article. Never do, 'trophy', 'big' and 'stuffed' - too gauche and by all means ditch the handles, lest you be tarred and feathered.
waiting... parsnip
“Get to the story, sir. Is this an urgent matter? Is someone in danger?”
It's all a very big struggle for me at the moment, and I've come to accept that it will be. Yet, I've had people tell me that it is for everyone. That it always will be. That this is the journey of life. And that does not sound kosher to me.
Grateful for Kenny’s new life, I continue to enjoy my own donor heart. I think about my donor every day. I often feel he’s close by. I pray I may live worthy of the miracle I received from my donor and from our Creator. Through the knowledge and wisdom of doctors, the Lord has given me more time.
The petition was incorrectly certified as “fair and truthful” when it simply, clearly was not. (using criteria established by the AG)
blogger from the law.
I'm a follower of Jesus, native of NJ, lover of all things Australian, victim of wanderlust, visual thinker, graphic designer, photographer, and an Emergent Presbyterian.
3 cups rice, cooked
Yes, you can see the vent. I’m working to get over that. But, I think the pair of ottomans help some. I just hate the leather, so I have a plan to have some tailored skirts made for them, kind of like the ones shown here:
-The Height Modulation Problem, in some zoning districts (depending on character) allow a site area bonus based on half width of boundary roads (to a maximum width) which will boost heights on corner sites. Introduce pre-application procedures, with design review for medium/larger projects, on the Abu-Dhabi model, so that urban design analysis forms the foundation for the working up of larger schemes. Introduce rules on succession zoning (modulated building heights) at zone edges to lower density districts (and edges of historic districts overlay zones).
In a large mixing bowl, combine the asparagus, reduced cream, and 1 cup of the Parmesan cheese; mix well and place in two individual (approximately 16 ounce) gratin dishes, or other equal-sized ovenproof baking dish. Sprinkle the remaining Parmesan over the tops of the asparagus. In a small mixing bowl, combine the panko bread crumbs and melted butter; sprinkle the bread crumbs on top of the dishes. Place the gratin dishes on a baking sheet, set in the oven, and bake until the asparagus are tender, the sauce is bubbling, and the bread crumbs are golden brown, 6 to 10 minutes. Serve hot.
Transitioning from the existential curriculum that advocates intellectual and affective development in the college classroom, I propose initiating a conversation about learning at the outset of every class, every semester.
One last run for you my friend if you want to see what you want to see!"
This tired is the kind of tired that follows a very full day, a day when you have a million things on your plate, and all of them are good. I think, "is it just Wednesday?" and I remember the full agendas coming up tomorrow and Friday, with lots of tasks and to-do's, and those things are good, too.
When I say jogging, I should also say, sprinting. Because although it is a direct route, the cars going down the street do not slow down.
4. Color 12 large white pearls and 8 smaller pearls with Copic Marker BG01.
Drizzle some light olive oil on each croquette. Bake in a preheated 375 F oven for ten minutes until golden. Remove from the oven and turn the croquettes onto the other side. Continue baking for an additional 10 minutes until the tops are golden. Makes 8
there are some
Curry leaves: 1 sprig
Fresh fruit and vegetables (and plants, seeds, animal products…etc!) are not allowed to cross the Chilean border, you must open all luggage to show border officials that you don’t have any on board. This included an x-ray of our duffle bags which are strapped on to the back of our bikes.
It took some time… but eventually it came out. It was a battle… Anger, guilt and love. And they went in that order. If I don’t love someone, it’s impossible for me to feel guilty about being angry. And I was REAL angry. There was a LOT less guilt though, there was no doubt that my anger was justified which I think helped.
As well as being a good general cleanser, it appears that a few shakes of baking soda in the bath helps to treat yeast-based diaper rash (one of the signs of which is little red spots over the rashy parts).
An overabundance of smiling
For now, I must give up this story. It's downright addictive. I started looking at the NY Times archives for C.C. Cuyler and Mrs. C.C. Cuyler and found more than enough interesting information for another post there, including C.C's death by a backwards-moving car in Biarritz in 1909 (his chauffeur was having trouble shifting from third gear to second.)
Alli Sports is an action sports lifestyle brand whose mission is to connect fans with athletes and brands through best in class events, media, and authentic branded products. Alli Sports includes: the Dew Tour, Lucas Oil Pro Motocross Championship and the Free Flow Tour; Alli Media which creates, produces, and distributes original content; Alli Ride Shop an online retailer carrying top skate and BMX consumer products; and Alli MotoShop an online retailer carrying top moto consumer products. Alli Sports is owned by NBC Sports. More information can be found at www.allisports.com.
Some of the best dialog I’ve ever read, Dostoyevsky-like in power and impact.
The Magpies striker found the net in each half to keep the visitors level on points with fourth-placed Tottenham and all but end Chelsea’s hopes of qualifying for Europe’s elite via the Premier League.
Going past the stealth and combat, there are other aspects of the design that don’t make sense. Why, for instance, is it halfway into the game before you get the line launcher? Batman orders several equipment drops throughout the game, and even though he realizes he’s going to be traversing a large city, doesn’t order this effective travel gadget for many hours. And then when he does, there was no reason for it, be it narratively ( he decides to get it out of nowhere), or in terms of you knowing about an upcoming challenge that would require it. It’s literally the designers saying, “Well, now you’re going to need this item, cause you’re coming to an area we designed that requires it.” In fact, one of the major things that bothered me was how there is so little context to WHY things happen, in either the design or the narrative.
The performances here is interesting, where the supporting cast either flaunt or hide their European accents (Besson by the way has occasionally portrayed America through his European lens), one of the prisoners, suffering from the dementia caused by the freezing, is acting like a Scottish gargoyle. Grace is painfully deadpan as a blonde-tressed damsel with sleepy eyes but all she needs was an impromptu haircut from Snow for her face to open and show her second note, shooting off the script’s witty banter to counter his remarks against her that are so sexist that they shouldn’t be taken seriously. Pearce’s performance here is lazy but it’s also admirable to watch him play devil’s advocate without trying. Together Grace and Pearce play off each other like middle school kids who punch each other as a shorthand for affection, Emilie learning the ropes even though Snow doesn’t readily give them to her.
I would like to thank the Academy, “wrong speech”, Just Me. I love stepping into her life through her writing. I like to believe we are cut from the same mold…but both of us would agree that we enjoy being a little different. Please make sure you check this wonderful Blog out!
The other type of wreck is the “natural” wreck. Often, a loss of life was associated with this type of wreck. It has certainly not been cleaned and prepared for divers’ safety and fun. There are damaged sections which could collapse at any time, shifting cargo or bulky material, rotting superstructure which finally drops to a lower level after decades of decay, or any of a thousand other potential deathtraps. Diving a natural wreck can be a dangerous thing. Also, as I mentioned first, when there was an associated loss of life, it has that added emotional element which a diver feels very intensely. Especially at night.
An “upstart” who would not get that opportunity was Bianca Knight (USA) who placed fourth at Nationals, but came back over the summer to take victories in Rome, Birmingham, and London! So entering the World Championships, Daegu would be the only race of the season where all the main combatants would go head to head, with Knight the only heavyweight not in attendance.
How do Muslims look? I don’t have to constantly wear a jalabia with a turban rolled over my head to be identified as a Muslim nor do you have to see me coming from the Masjid. For me, I see Religion as inordinately personal and I like to keep my boundaries so as not to offend my neighbors and the people around me. I don’t think my neighbors would be happy if I decide to wake them up in the morning with my CD player blasting verses of the Holy Qur’an, but because I don’t do that, I don’t conform. On many occasions while travelling via public transport, one of the passengers would step up before the bus moves and announce, ‘let’s pray’ and I roll my eyes not because I don’t believe in Prayers but because he/she has assumed that all the passengers are Christians or such a person just doesn’t care, it’s more like ‘in your face bitches’.
Excessive immigration brings enormous pressures to communities and families all over Britain. Not that I’d know.
Living in the middle of town was a plus for Elizabeth. She could see Jerry anytime she chose to. Shortly after taking Elizabeth home, Jerry clocked in at the station and went on patrol. It was only a few moments after hitting the streets when Jerry got a call from Elizabeth. “Jerry, come pick me up. We need to talk.” Elizabeth said. “I’m on my way,” Jerry replied as he drove back toward Elizabeth’s house. Jerry’s mind was racing. He feared something was very wrong. His heart was pounding as he pulled into the driveway. And before Jerry could get out of his cruiser, Elizabeth came out of her house wearing nothing but Jerry’s old high school jacket. However, Jerry didn’t know she was totally naked that coat.
The pilot episode of Veep is available on HBO On Demand, HBO Go, iTunes and youtube.
This is quite an honor. However, for a team and their coaches to travel and compete in Knoxville, TN is expensive! We have a lot of money to raise in a little time. This is an experience of a lifetime for these 7 children and I know that with the effort of our parents and community we will achieve our goal.
Of your kin
I think I am going to make this story my Nano project… at least for the sake of first drafts. I hit a little over 50,000 words on it in 2010 and added somewhere around 14,000 or so in 2011′s Nano with a few extra thousand tossed in during the year between. I’m passionate about this story, but I’m not sure if I have the get-up-and-go to finish the first draft of this epic when I’m not under pressures from Nano. Barring any major changes, this project is on hold until Nano 2012 when I plan on tackling it full force again.
Well done to all our entrants for the last challenge. Funny cards are not easy and it was great to see a good amount of you were up for our DT call. I'll be back tonight with the winners of challenges 20 and 21 and hope to contact the DT winners over the next day or two.
Both our admissions dean, Katie, and our tour guide, Steph, emphasized the close nature of the relationships that students form with professors. Steph also sang the praises of librarians who specialize in helping students gather sources for research papers and said she was able to check out texts for her paper on Chinese Hermits which had not been touched for decades.
She wants to expose Sam! How evil!
Under the cover of darkness, my husband and I took our legless couch and made the switch! We were so pleased with ourselves as we brought our new find home. We placed the couch next to our card table and two metal chairs we called the dining table.
And we were gettin dry…”
I know. But, because I love them, I suck it up and get excited with them. And if Chloe hadn't been on the verge of nap time, I would've joined them in the snow. And because I just adore the heck out of them, I wrap them in blankets when they come in and make hot cocoa for them. Nothing like a cold snowy day when I'd prefer to snuggle up by the fire and read a book all day to remind me of my selfishness.
The only issue I had was the $3 bottle deposit! I understand the concept and would be fine with it, except we live in Ohio. I am not able to get back to NC to recover the cost and we recycle everything anyways! That extra cost pushed the price of the growler to $14 (for 4 pints). Either way it was a good beer and hope to be able to try a few more from Green Man in the future.
We paid: 70 Soles for a double room with cable TV and private bathroom. It was a nice place, but the hot water wasn’t very hot. You can ask at reception for them to turn it up though. Also, prepare to have fun trying to open the front door.
Boston:
We die. It’s true, it’s dirty, it’s blunt, but dying is not sad.
Remove from the fire.
Me and Dallin!!!
Lately, as readers of this blog can attest, I have been having serious anxiety about my life and purpose. In fact, I would venture a guess that perhaps this is my quarter-life crisis. And that got me to thinking: what really is a quarter life crisis, anyway?
Naikan is a Japanese word which means “inside looking” or “introspection”, or even “seeing oneself with the mind’s eye”. It is a structured method of self-reflection that helps us to understand ourselves, our relationships and the fundamental nature of human existence. It broadens our view of reality.
There is also a well-known winery on the grounds, and a reconstructed “farm village” area I’d love to visit, but it was getting late and we had reservations for dinner. Miss Chef and I decided that we did want to come back to see the rest of the estate, so we stopped long enough to upgrade our passes to 12-month passes. Oh my! I’m a season passholder at Biltmore! I never expected that. This place is expensive, but it was cheaper to pay for the upgrade than to pay for another admission. So…wondering if Miss Chef might be willing to come again in a couple of weeks for azalea season? And then there’s always our traditional fall mountain getaway…we might have to get very familiar with Interstate 40 this year!
Click Here for our second episode or check out the handy dandy player below. We apologize about the length, we just couldn't help being so excited to see Jane and Maura again!
build a positive, active learning environment and having a positive
Q: It was a great battle with Hamilton. Tell us about the pass and the re-pass.
To quote the good Reverend I.M. Jolly, ""Ah've had a helluva year" Masters Degree completed and all. I had fully expected to enjoy the academic work, but hadn't realised that I would meet so many wonderful and lovely people, some of whom were even North American. Which shows me that I shouldn't be so quick to retort to lazy stereotypes. In fact if I've learned two things this years its that i utterly detest xenophobia... and the Dutch.
I'm leaving for a 2 week vacation tomorrow so if I'm quiet for a bit, that's why. I can thank my friend Suzanne for getting married in Maui for the first week of it all. If she wasn't getting married there, we probably wouldn't have gone to Hawaii. So yay for that! It's going to be extra awesome because it's still pretty cool in Vancouver right now. I'm hoping to find some interesting vegan food to talk about while I'm there. Someone told me about this place that makes coconut milk ice cream from fresh coconuts. Yum!
Not the reaction I was expecting. I dug in my heels. The writing books say to write what you feel. Use your writing as your space to be true and go ahead and write without worries of what others think. ”It’s not about you, it’s my writing, my journey…” I dug myself in deeper.
Notice I said "could." As in past tense.
Obama: (Jaw drops onto desk)
What would it feel like?
I miss my little munchkin like crazy and also his crazy older brother and sisters. But the change of pace is sorta nice. If only I could just come to work once in a while, instead of every freaking week.
After a very busy Saturday I wanted to keep it nice and simple - both in activity and attire.
I'm talking about this.
He told me that after he finished working on this, he walked along the Grand Union Canal from Bethnal Green and up through the Lea Valley listening on headphones. He assures me that the music proved a very satisfactory companion, which opinion I pass on for any others considering the same walk.'
The Agriculture Department announced Monday, shortly after FoxNews.com published its initial report on the video, that Sherrod had resigned.
leaving a trail of
Most retailers are saying that they won't be putting up their prices immediately. But they will over the next few weeks, no doubt about it.
Hey fellow readers!
Kids start to taunt,
It bugs me.
“Basically this means CISPA can no longer be called a cybersecurity bill at all. The government would be able to search information it collects under CISPA for the purposes of investigating American citizens with complete immunity from all privacy protections as long as they can claim someone committed a “cybersecurity crime”. Basically it says the 4th Amendment does not apply online, at all. Moreover, the government could do whatever it wants with the data as long as it can claim that someone was in danger of bodily harm, or that children were somehow threatened, again, notwithstanding absolutely any other law that would normally limit the government’s power.”
I work all day, and get half-drunk at night.
The Excuse
That name again is Rufi Cole. Keep your eyes open for it. Her first book can’t be all that far off.
- Mr David Lambert Rock Art Conservator of the Cultural Heritage Division of the NPWS visits site
The audience were not only hostile, but they were clearly primed to do whatever they could to discomfort Griffin, cheering even the most inane of comments from his opponents, including Liberal Democrat Chris Hulme, who I recall said things, but can't for the life of me remember what. Meanwhile any comment by Griffin was immediately jeered and booed irrespective of it merit.
-SALMAN RUSHDIE! I have no idea if he is still under the fatwa, but I can safely say he’s not in hiding anymore, (unless he is presuming that Muslim extremists either don’t read The Daily Telegraph or refuse to visit Eastern Wales for some reason). ‘Midnight’s Children‘ remains in my Top 10 of all-time favourite books, (although anyone who knows me will realise that my Top 10′s can often consist of dozens of items!), and having read the majority of his back catalogue, I can’t wait to meet the wordsmith.
Dick Monologues Presents: PETS!
Hot peppers: Although they haven’t been directly linked to weight loss, spicy habaneros or jalapeños aid in curbing the desire to gorge since we typically eat less when our food has a fiery flavor. Hot peppers also comprise the compound capsaicin, which speeds up the metabolism.
The other boss element of this salad is of course, the roasted sesame. Always warming, nutty and familiar, sesame somehow turns any ho-hum dish into “oh, what did you do to this?” Such a cheap trick, but it works every time.
clapping and requesting christmas songs from the carolers.
(President Obama campaigned in part on changing this. It hasn't changed yet.)
If your plans don’t permit a Saturday stay over, try buying two one-way tickets from a low-cost carrier like Southwest or JetBlue, which don’t require round-trip purchases to access the lowest prices.
"Sugar sugar, doo doo doo doo doo-doo
HAYWARD AC, HARLING R, WETTEN SI, et al. Vaccinating care home staff against influenza to prevent illess, health service use and death among residents: a cluster randomised controlled trial. Abstract Second European Influenza Conference 2005: S21-3.
That invitation was disclosed with RM150.00 worth credit voucher.
Anyways, on to the goodness that came my way this morning...
Just steps from the Alamo is the famous Riverwalk. If you've never been here it is something that I would recommend seeing. The San Antonio River runs right through the center of the city and along the many veins of the river the city has built shops and restaurants. There are even tour boats that travel right through the middle of everything.
This month marks our BIG opening and in its honor I'd like to walk you through how to order and encourage you to give it a try.
”When you’re working on your book, you will undoubtedly be tempted by Fresh Start Sirens. Gorgeous, tantalizing new book ideas will arrive, making juicy promises. These new ideas are going to pop up, assuring you a baggage-free new beginning. They want to lure you away from your existing project, those boring bad days of writing month after month, no end in sight. The Sexy New Book idea always promises it will never be difficult; it will never be a burden. It says it’s way, way more publishable, plus more fun. It whispers, Take me now. I’m all yours.
Without more income within your pouches, you simply have to visit the net and look for the correct loan providerOrlender and you may complete the necessary application. Once the sort is chock-full effectively, you can only have to hold off until the financial loan app is validated. After a long time, you can view should the loan has been within your bank checking account. The lending products are you’ll pay with a thirty days but some individuals prolong for an additional thirty days in particular those with much larger Loans although with yet another fee.
1. The Bramble
The next morning, our couple returns home only to find Se Na waiting for them. Girl, just give it up and return to your evil boyfriend.
Hyperion
This is My dearest and most treasured wish, to take all of My cherished children home to the rightful place to which they belong.
As part of the exhibit, there were two huge glass tanks filled with the "debris" of his career: cameras, film, piles of old photographs, books, leather camera cases, lights made from tin cans, old wooden frames, drawings, and pairs of glasses with bits of metal strands used as ear pieces. For me, these were the best part.
Two feet refrigerated wrapped in soft and fluffy slippers.
*shrugs*
Emotional disorganization, or stage 3 of the emotional cycle of deployment, occurs during the first six weeks of deployment. My experience with this cycle, as the mother of a soldier, is different from that of a spouse; my husband is still here, my daily routine doesn’t change, and I don’t take on new responsibilities as a single parent and head of the household.
Left alone and defenseless at betrayal’s adieu
Show a marble in your hand, and then cover it with a handkerchief. Say, “Feel under this handkerchief. Is the marble still there?”
Randed shoes are losing popularity by this time period. That's not to say they don't exist, but the English seem to use them much less commonly after 1760 (this is the only post-1750 example on the Shoe Icons site). It makes for a much sturdier shoe, and the sole can be replaced. The rand is stitched to the upper, then the rand is stitched to the outsole, all right side out.
After removing the stencil, I just poured on the embossing powder as normal and heated with an embossing fan. If you do not have that you can hold it over the electric stove - works just as well.
If they are dry, you can mist them slightly with your water mister'
Hello there, Julie here with my very first post for Just Magnolia h'Anglar and sTangler, and I'm just a bit excited! Thank you to all who participated in the Anything Goes with the option of Sparkle Challenge last week. We had so many lovely entries! Without further ado we have a winner to announce:
Morning all! Another beautiful, bright and sunny day here - I hope you have the same :)
7. "Can't Hold Out Much Longer"
For someone who has not stepped into a house of worship for a very long time, except to attend the occasional funeral, it may seem inappropriate for me to be writing about prayer, but the fact is that I pray every day, if by prayer one means a brief conversation with God. For me prayer has always been a great solace, a confirmation of my belief that there is, indeed, a greater power. I take this on faith, but so does everyone, other than atheists.
6. Suicidal or Self-injurious Behaviors:
Today finally marked the first day that I clock in extra hours in my office.. I was anticipating this to happen, therefore way in February 2012, I have got myself the backup plan having someone in the evening in the house to care for Princess while I am still at work.. I never anticipated that it will happen the very first day when the helper come!!
greek yogurt or crème fraîche for serving
then I can make fake double eyelid like this.
no doubt the universe is unfolding as it should. – Desiderata
Nests
to make tang zhong:
The faithless lore of Germany,
The second reveal was Team Adam: Katrina Parker vs Tony Lucca. Last night I enjoyed Tony Lucca but Katrina Parker was my favorite singer. Adam split his points giving: Katrina – 40; Tony – 60. The reason? I didn’t really understand the reasoning. It made no sense to me. It was weird. I guess he feels a connection with Tony but he feels she is still incredible. Adding America’s vote: Katrina – 92; Tony – 108. So Tony advances. If the coaches didn’t have a vote, America’s vote would’ve stood alone with Katrina – 52 and Tony – 48. Crazy. Congrats to Tony.
“The Trees are alive boy!” She cried. “Some of the trees are the fallen of the wrong Men, these trees are evil, and wish you dead!”
So, in a nutshell, I’m feeling almost the exact same way I was two weeks ago, except now I’m much more angry and much less in love.
butterfly shoes of a skater set
Spring is here on the farm in a burstingly glorious way this year. All that death and drought last year? The rains poured and poured and poured starting in November, and boy howdy has the earth made up for lost time!
5. Shower Cleaner: The moist, humid environment inside a bathroom can often lead to mold. To clean AND prevent it from happening again, spritz the shower, curtain liner and all, with vodka. Chemical-free and effective.
The challenges seem to always focus around a strong survey design using the proper equipment for the expected model in terms of depth and geometry, optimal sampling intervals for high-quality mapping resolution and cost effectiveness. As always, it is incumbent upon the geophysicist to determine the physical property characteristics of a target and its host rock, and to conduct orientation surveys to quantitatively assess optimum survey parameters.
So what can I say about Anna and the French Kiss? It was absolutely, brilliantly, marvelously AMAZING!! I am so glad I lsitened to all of the bloggers who raved about this book because it is simply wonderwul. I am definitely a fan of Stephanie Perkins now and will most likely read everything she publishes.
…a flexible or elastic body still has coherent parts which form a fold, with a result that they do not separated into parts of parts, but rather divide infinitely into smaller and smaller folds that always retain a certain cohesion. [4]
I liked this exercise. Klein seemed to like it too. She likes to be a little lazy either when jumps are 2'6" and below OR if the first jump in the line is lower than the last. In that case if the first jump is lower she just assumes that the second jump is the same height and she'll take the last one out. Jeffray told me if we're doing something where I think that will happen, don't put her boots on her. Let her learn and start to care about paying attention. Well, today...she did just that, ONCE and learned her lesson. I made sure I had the wooden rails (we have PVC too) up and she came through the first lower jump and the second one was at 3'3" and she took the rail. All it took was once, she didn't touch it again. I eventually raised both jumps to 3'3" but after she proved to me she could pay attention by going through a couple times with the first jump lower.
Trackable: Track what you put out and not just bin it. Your links, posts, images and videos all add to your brand’s social capital. So, track that link going out, find out who retweets you and what. At the end of the day establish a benchmark for you- weekly and monthly. Compare it your efforts and find out how you are performing. Eventully its the ROI that matters based on your business goals. So, don’t forget to track your content and its effectivess. Possibly you have got your call to action wrong – how many downloaded that white paper you sent out or was that branded video which got most traffic to your website. Develop a set of metrics for yourself, without making it too complicated and geeky.
On July /5 / 2011 the jury found Casey not guilty of aggravated manslaughter, first-degree murder, and aggravated child abuse. She was however, found guilty of four misdemeanour counts of providing false information to a law enforcement officer. 1) Casey told law enforcement that she was employed at Universal Studios during 2008, pursuant to the investigation of a missing persons report, and leading the investigation astray. 2) Casey also told law enforcement that she had left Caylee at an apartment complex with a babysitter causing the authorities to pursue the missing babysitter. 3) Casey told law enforcement that she informed two “employees” of Universal Studios (where she lied about being employed) of the disappearance of Caylee. 4) Casey lied to the authorities and claimed she had received a call and spoke to Caylee on July / 15 /2008, causing them to expend further resources. None of which will carry a sentence that has much impact.
* I am not sure this was necessarily the case, as it turned out to not be the greatest match ever seen
MH: Sounds great. Did any of this have to do with your NaNoWriMo experience last year? How did it feel to push out 50,000 words in a month?
There’s five on tap and two to come,
Well, I've been trying to get my home back in order and thought I would show you my mantel.
Blow whistle, steel rails keep on humming
Then, one morning, 2Es and I raided the children's section at Borders, read through ALL of his books, and came across a poem that matched our intentions. It's called ATIONS.
I will be working on improving the SEO and SERP of the company domains! Along with improving the companies online presence and other taskes like testing to changes to products, Coming up with marketing campaigns, creating a sales guide for the sales team targetign namely our resellers.
aligned them into a straight, single-file line.
Yesterday "The Missy Malone & Friends Burlesque Revue" hit the road for Boston (Lincolnshire!) and the Blackfriars Theatre!
the fat white rich newscasters
09-Ain't Nobody's Business
when they saw that the Gospel to the Uncircumcision was committed unto me, as the Gospel to the Circumcision was unto Peter (for He that wrought effectually in Peter to the apostleship of the Circumcision, that Same was mighty in me toward the Gentiles) . . . (2:7-8)
Based on the fun and explorative nature of this six-part series, the Toyota Camry SE was the perfect vehicle to take Hyde from battling it out on the basketball court with former New York Knicks player John Starks, to blowing flames at a notorious Coney Island freak show, and behind-the-scenes of the off-Broadway hit Fuerza Bruta!
Full of fun, depth, and laughs, My One and Only is the perfect read to spring any reader into a great mood. I simply can’t wait to read more by Ms. Higgins.
You need to wash the leaves to get rid of the bugs though.
May be you are prepared to cope with online marketing – or you just think you are sure. Please, try to collect as more details and facts and guidelines as you can. But there is also a thing about selecting up and how to cope with details in the Web. It is simpler to select up details and facts not in the Web, but it will take you more cash. Please, try to be sure in everything you do – from details and facts you are collecting to set up your company to techniques you use when assistance your business`s complete move.
Pepper, a dash
and each leaf is individual, above the gravestones
Place the fruit mixture into an 8×10 inch baking dish, layer on the crumble and bake until the topping is crisp, about 50 minutes.
The canal swung around the hillside above the concrete ruin of the old city and then turned West again where Federas clung to the side of the valley. It was a small town even by modern standards, dwarfed by the old city, though every building was stone and slate, not wood.
- Well, you either like the wine or you don't, the lady said, smiling, inwardly rolling her eyes at yet another ignorant buffoon with too much money.
Here is a close up of the spinner and game:
- Edible gardening will continue to be a hot topic.
I'll never forget the time I witnessed a couple breakup at my bar. A woman had come into the restaurant and sat at the bar by herself. I poured her a glass of wine and asked if she would be dining at the bar. She told me that she was a half-hour early for her reservation and was waiting for her dinner date. Forty-five minutes and three glasses of wine later, the woman's date walked through the door. Before he could have a seat at the bar and set his stuff down, the woman began yelling at him for being late. Awkward. Especially since these were the only two people I had at the bar.
And I'd love to see Nicholas Sparks who seems to give his female readers exactly what they want, peddling condoms, ribbed for her pleasure of course.
underneath is where the connection comes from.
We’re half-way through the school holidays and this morning my six-year-old was bored and in a bad mood. Whatever I suggested, he didn’t like it. I decided to forget about pleasing him and do something I wanted to do instead. The weather was perfect for taking headstone photos so I took my reluctant, grumpy boy to a local cemetery.
2003 Massachusetts declares legislature has to enact same-sex marriage (on a side note, between this and Romney’s dealings with the legislature…what the hell kind of constitution do they have in the commonwealth? The balance of powers seems completely out of whack)
Dying over everything in this space. The first thing I would try to jam into my purse is your stunning coffee table:
Remember the good times that we had?
3) The meal plan may be the way to go. I didn’t know how easy it would be to use, or how flexible, so opted not to bother. But we probably would have saved a small fortune given that we ate nearly every meal for five days on Disney property (no small coin dropped there).
Now as Saturday closes hopefully the worst is over. While it may seem we went around our elbows to get to our thumbs, early this afternoon we bought a 2012 Kia Rio. Much to my surprise it looks like I will be driving the Rio since it is far better on gas mileage that either the Toyota Corolla or the Honda CRV. As much as Spoilboy hates it, he is now the “owner” of the Honda CRV, the breaking point came after we looked at one of his beloved Jeep Cherokees. Once again, the Carfax report showed huge issues with the car that the used car dealer did not want to discuss.
Earlier today a customer walks in and says his laptop is not working. It will not connect to the internet. He goes on to tell me that he was on the phone with technical support for over 2 hours and during the past week he has still been unable to get on the web. I asked him to power up his laptop. I kid you not, I didn’t even touch the laptop, but as soon as it booted up it connected to the internet.
Konkatsu!
That was until an invitation arrived from ‘The Garage’, Matilda Bay’s brewing home and source of new and interesting beers and something of a ‘beer birthing suite’ when it comes to the special things in the beer world. From this unassuming building in Melbourne’s outer south east we have seen all sorts of weird and wonderful creatures emerge - from a Barking Duck and Flamingo, a Dogbolter and a Fat Yak to a Redback and a Beez Neez. Couple these with Grayston and Big Helga and you could be forgiven for thinking that that this brewery was, in fact, some sort of mad scientist’s lair.
Instead, the rich forced working people across the globe to pay for their “crisis” through punitive “austerity” programs that gutted public services and repealed workers’ rights.
Without further ado....
7) Mississippi Prison Inmate/ Forced Labor
Two great hoppy beers that really couldn't have been more different. The Nugget Nectar was hoppier with the Hopslam winning on sweetness. Basically depends on what you are looking for from your beer. I will say both bottle pictures are great. Nugget Nectar has a fist squeezing a hop while Hopslam has a dude crushed by a bunch of hops. Very unique designs.
Being disrespectful = 20 bucks
I can hardly remember what life was like before you came along
Shoes: Spada
Mr. C asked me what will I be doing while he’s watching the double-headers. Oh. Guess I should occupy myself. I was counting on spending some time with Mr. C, being as the kids are at their dad’s this weekend. But ok, we can compromise. We’ll run errands in the morning & I’ll keep myself busy the rest of the time. What to do, what to do……take down Christmas decorations. Read on the treadmill. Vacuum. Watch a movie.
So, if you are interested to see, the Sentosa Flowers 2011 will be on display till this Sunday, 13 February 2011. More information can be found at the website.
Now, the reason for this law is that sin stems from the corruption of our heart. Now, what does this mean? John Owen has this amazing quote where he says that ‘…the seat and subject of this law of sin… Scripture everywhere assigns it to be the heart. There indwelling sin keeps its especial residence.’[1]
CEO Sergei Kostenko, who is also head of the Russian office of the U.S.-based Space Adventures, stated that the cost of space tourism should drop from the present $60 million per trip, about 1 week, to a "mere" $15 million. Sure, its still out of reach of the vast majority of humanity, but its a start a one that will already cut costs by 75%.
minutes to 2.5 hours a month reading their digital titles. Time spent consuming content has increased 70 percent over the last six months, which can be attributed to more sophisticated and engaging content as well as the continued adoption of tablets. Consumers tend to open a Digital Publishing Suite application up to five times per month on average, and nine percent of readers spend more than five hours per month reading digital titles, which suggests that they are frequently
Winner: Kernel Galaxy IPA - (Everyone raves about the Kernel's stouts and porters with good reason, but no-one gets true hop flavour like this into their IPA's)
### ODT Online Thu, 14 Jan 2010
Recent conversations with intellectual property practitioners -- both those who are unemployed and those who are underemployed -- have caused me to wonder whether we too have a euphemism for this condition. It's called "doing some mediation".
Eye Rock Designer Liner - These were the item that I was kinda of eh about when I got my box and even though they're not my favorite and I wouldn't wear them on a regular basis, they were really fun to try!!
The intention is that from 2011 onwards DFID focuses exclusively on issues of climate change in Indonesia, and delivers this by forming a joint UK Climate Change Unit with other government departments located in the British Embassy and withdraws from development work in other areas.
Here are the products I reviewed:
Let’s skip all the peripheral items that don’t matter (Bono’s politics and charitable efforts, whether or not U2 is “overrated”), strip away all the hype and bullshit, and simply discuss the music.
In Charlotte news, she's become my most finicky potty user to date. She will NOT use any other potty except her red one. She will NOT poop on any potty, including her beloved red one (in her underwear or on the floor will do just fine, thankyouverymuch @@). She WILL, however, insist on wearing underwear to bed at night only to pee herself 30 minutes later then scream bloody murder while she's cleaned up, a diaper is put on her and the sheets are changed. She also insists on sitting on the potty to fart. Unfortunately for me, she's quite gaseous. How is this my life?
Oracle Enterprise Manager 12c introduces a new concept called “Metric Extensions”, that replaces the concept of User Defined Metrics.
Blue ceiling, here I come!
So paste (CMD+V). to your text editor of choice
Of interest to North Texas consumers is the former owner and brewer of Fort Worth's award-winng The Covey Restaurant & Brewery, Jamie Fulton, will be involved in Fort Bend Brewing as a consulting brewer.
my restriction!!! yahoo!!!! Last night I was eating some pasta and had only taken two bites and recognized a feeling I haven't really had in about 4 months and sure as heck, I was STUCK!! Who knew being stuck would bring me so much joy!! I have noticed that in the last few days, my eating has really tapered off and I haven't been able to eat as much as I had in weeks prior (believe me I was getting nervous that my weight was going to reach an all-time high based on the quantity of food I've been eating) and it's not been taking me as long as usual to get full.. and I haven't really gained anything in about 2 weeks, so that's all good news to me. I figure as long as I'm still eating fairly healthy (we won't talk about the tablespoon or two of frosting I had to have yesterday!) then I should be able to keep up with this weight maintenance for the next few months. Of course, as with everything with this pregnancy, things keep changing day to day so we'll see!!
Obama’s stepfather was a practicing Muslim.
A craft-person’s product is normally thought to be useful or functional
Sega picked an oddly appropriate time to announce a North American PlayStation 3 release for its new zombie-filled Yakuza game, along with an oddly familiar name. If I were the head of Dark and Demon’s Souls developer From Software I’d definitely be sitting at my desk right now, stroking my beard (I’d have a beard) thoughtfully and pondering calling in someone from legal.
RITAN PARK 日坛公园 – Party location. Home to the Temple of the Sun.
Girl Scout 1: Actually, they're called Caramel Delights. Apparently, the Island People didn't like being associated with all that coconut, caramel and chocolate. They said it was 'offensive' or something.
2 Tbsp. lemon zest (if using blueberries)
º “Oppose Unfair Pension Cuts.”
A lot of work went into it and I must say I super love the results!! The pictures turn out SO GORGEOUS!
Many of the blogs that I follow are those of other 3rd grade teachers. I have only been teaching for nine years but I have not always been a 3rd grade teacher. I actually began my career teaching Kindergarten, which oh my goodness those were some very tiring years! I digress. Six years ago, my last year in Kindergarten before looping with that WONDERFUL class to first grade, we got a new superintendent in my district. His name was Dr. Wise. This confused my adorable little five year olds because when they think of doctors they only think of medical doctors. I could see the terror on their faces as one of my kids asked if he was going to give them a shot when he came to visit our school. So in order to try and put them at ease I told them that when someone is very smart and goes to school for a very long time they can get a degree that allows people to call them "doctor."
TEAM S.A.S had fun, too, with our sponsors images and here are their cards for your inspiration. As always, you can click on their names to go to their blogs for all the details on the cards and to leave some well deserved compliments on their creativity.
Now back to Mr. Buffett – my understanding is that he does still work for his company but chooses to take his pay in the form of stocks. That means that he has enough money to live on so instead of taking actual pay then he pays only 15% on the profit on his investment annually (the stock). Now in reality if he sells that stock he will pay the higher tax rate again but right now he is only being taxed on the capital gains he receives. So you are not comparing apples to apples in this scenario. Of course the ultimate irony about the Buffett rule is that is comes from a man who one minute states he wants to pay more but doesn’t go to the IRS web site that allows him to pay more of his own free will, and who says he should pay more one moment and next the company that he is chief executive of, Berkshire Hathaway, is behind in taxes by millions of dollars dating back to 2002 and is fighting in court what they should pay. Hypocrisy thy name if Buffet.
When governments force onto people a behaviour which is contrary to their intuitive and highly sophisticated inherent patterns, that is tyranny. This may not be the dictionary definition, but it is a more tangible and qualitative measure of tyranny.
Welcome to the Back To School Blog Hop!!
I know I was probably a little curt with at least the second person when I told them that I have faith. I’ve got all the dang faith in God in the world. But I do not believe it is faith that keeps babies alive. That (to me) would mean that my faith wasn’t strong enough to keep you alive. And that’s crap! I believe that bad stuff happens…really horrible, terrible bad stuff. But, having faith means that I believe that no matter what happens to your little sister or your big sister or you daddy or anyone else that I love, God will carry me through it and that God will somehow bring good out of the cruddy things that can/may/do happen in life. That, to me, is faith.
Anyway, I had a few stories that I wanted to share about her. She is too, too much for me and I kinda worry about the future! :) She has been blessed with an ability to learn things very quickly and vocabulary seems to be one of her strong points.
With a background in tool making, Peter was able to talk with the students about how designs can be adapted to optimise design for manufacture. Considerations such as wall thickness (influential upon cooling time and thus the time the machinery is none operational), gate points and tool balancing were all covered.
The Canadian suffers from a rare lung and heart condition – pulmonary embolism. He has previously undergone two open-heart operations at the Ottawa Heart Institute and he requires constant medication. Around the time of arrest, his supply of medication, which he had brought from Canada, ran out. He has been without treatment for nearly four months now.
Kansas City: MIAMI — The most effective official in the U.S. diplomatic mission in Havana may well be a U.S. Coast Guard officer who’s technically a counter-drug specialist but is sometimes approached by the Cuban government for some back-channel diplomacy.
Feathered Nest Friday
Educating today's girls to be tomorrow's leaders
Icing sugar, for dusting
I think we might be finally ready to let go of the binky. I never thought I'd get to say it but I think we are there. Hallelujah! She did find one hidden in some dark corner of the house so there was one night she had it, but the babysitter put her to bed and he didn't know. So I'm just not counting that night.
Level 8: Mastery: +59%, Weapon ATT: +8, Minimum Critical Damage: +4%.
After 10 years together (this past Sunday!), Husband and I finally got the whole gift giving thing right this year.
Two posts in one day and the day is still young! LOL...
It's not just Queens of course, as every street in New York brings out its own inner world of life and love, from the different games children play to the way in which their parents watch (or don't) over them. From the produce sold in markets to who has the rule of the sidewalk streets (Vendors or Strollers? Artists or Arsons? Produce or Pot?). People are so silly sometimes, don't they see this diversity, this range, this breathtaking freedom to chose who to be and when to be it, is what makes our city, and country, so achingly beautiful? New York, new york, I love you I love you I love you.
Now, before I get any further for any of you Americans reading. Let me help you out with how to pronounce these cities.
Her 2005 debut Arular knocked the music world on its ass. The song "Galang" (co-written by her one-time roomate, Justine Frischmann, formerly of elastica) just sounded so different. 2007's Kala featured the Clash-sampling "Paper Planes" (itself sampled by Jay-Z, T.I., Kanye West and Lil Wayne on their hit, "Swagga Like Us"). That album brought her to another level, especially after "Swagga" (and her memorable performance at the Grammys, while incredibly pregnant).
What's up on South First Street? Activity. Tons of activity. One of my favorite chef teams recently opened their own French-inspired restaurant that is turning heads left and right. Todd Duplechan (formerly of Trio at the Four Seasons) and Jessica Maher (formerly of Dishalicious and Dai Due) brought upscale dining with warm ambience to my neck of the woods. Todd is truly a master of execution. He can take any run of the mill recipe and execute it so well that it makes you wonder what kind of magic he's doing in the back. Add that to Jessica's expert ways with butter, flour, and sugar; and life is good in the 78704. The restaurant is called Lenoir, pronounced like Len- waaaaaaaaa. Follow them on Twitter @Lenoir_Austin.
Have a safe and enjoyable Fourth of July!
I'm waiting for a package to arrive. In it will be my new and, hopefully, comfortable walking shoes. I hope they are everything I expect them to be because my feet really need them. I haven't had a pair of sensible shoes since I left the States and have always walked on shoes or boots that were meant to be pretty but not necessarily good to walk in.
I thought I'd mention that I started participating in Cathy Zielske's Move More, Eat Well class this week. I'm not a very good student. I think it's hard for me to be motivated mostly because I don't need to lose weight. However, I definitely DO need to exercise more and eat a lot healthier than I do. I'm now 35 years old and starting to both look and feel my age, which I don't like. I also have a 5-year-old son who I probably need to start setting a better example for. So, yeah. Old habits die hard. And my theory is they die harder when there's very little extrinsic motivation (such as the need to lose weight) to kill them. (especially when it's not really socially acceptable for a thin girl to talk about these things as if they were a "struggle". I get that). Moving on.
Scientists, doctors, and others scrambled around trying to cure what seemed like a growing number of baffling diseases. Some even guessed that it could be the cyanide itself causing the problems. After all, it was in everything, wasn’t it? But then look at all the people who ate and drank cyanide like everyone else and never got sick – they seemed to be fine. Baffling…
Mass ended, reception followed where she dashed from Point A to Point B like a house on fire, ripped off her veil and waved it around, and was a general menace to the public.
17 Thorn of Crowns
To do this, we had to make some suppositions. We started with the way news is reported, and we looked at 1) political and news magazines, 2) local and national newspapers, and 3) cable and local television news.
I participated in NaNoWriMo, and here is the continued story I wrote this year.
Nomo became the prototype for Japanese pitchers in the US. A couple years of dominance and popularity, followed by injury and mediocrity. I don't know if this has to happen to all Japanese pitchers, it just seems to have happened to all of them. Nomo, though, was first and probably best.
Although Autistic Disorder is associated with several congenital conditions, the cause for most cases is unknown. The present study was undertaken to determine whether breastfeeding or the use of infant formula supplemented with docosahexaenoic acid and arachidonic acid is associated with Autistic Disorder. The hypothesis is that breastfeeding and use of infant formula supplemented with docosahexaenoic acid/arachidonic acid are protective for Autistic Disorder.Methods
Gah, I haven't sewn anything in weeks! I really, really want to but I'm very reluctant to do so. The skirt from the previous post is already a tad too big! I've worn it maybe 3 times total. I can't keep making things only to have them not fit in weeks! That said I do need bottoms. I have one pair of jeans that fit and this skirt. I have two pairs of leggings too but those are pretty limited in what I can wear them with. That's it, I have no more bottoms! Those poor jeans are getting a lot of wear!
The muse returned when Lexi’s oldest child was a toddler and Lexi has been writing ever since. After piling up an impressive number of rejections on her first book, a fantasy romance that she worked on for more than ten years, Lexi decided to try her hand at something else. The result was Demon Hunting in Dixie, a paranormal romance about demon hunters in the Deep South. The muse is very happy, and so is Lexi.
Deputies canvassed the business and found two damaged soft drink machines in the back of the store.
Bergevin also skated in 80 career Stanley Cup Playoffs contests with five different teams, recording nine points (3G, 6A) and 52 penalty minutes.
Some important cues could be taken is from the plays own staging, which was well done. Donna Marquet, set designer, and Rand Ryan, lighting designer, understand a great deal about Edward Hopper. The audience gasped when the curtain was drawn. One exuberant lady sighed, “It’s the painting!”
Level 11: MP Cost: 12, Attacks up to 5 enemies, Damage: 118%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
This made me nervous. Before she and I even started talking, I knew that what I had been told had happened, had not really happened, and that made sense to me because really, they would never have left a kid unattended, even if he were sleeping. Their whole job is to attend to him (and the other kids); they would not just leave him. Of course not.
Travelling along Quai D'Orsay with the elegant Air France building in the background
1. What is your dream vacation?
That’s why they’ve extended the Soul Train Cruise 2013 early booking period by a month. Today was the final day to book this soulful music cruise and get up to $200 off the cruise rate.
Fortunately my something nice was going home after a cancelled babysitting job. I hurt in lots of jointed areas today and really miss having a bath. Showers get you awake but are not soothing.
Vanilla ice cream coated in caramelised white chocolate and macadamia nuts
On very cold days I also wear a Balaclava , long dark parts and a long sleeved dark running shirt. Some days I look like a ninja with iPod wires dangling out of my neck.
The kind of leaders God will use in the next spiritual awakening here in America will resemble those He used in Uganda—leaders who admit they don’t know what to do, so they fall on their knees in desperation and cry out to God for His deliverance; and leaders who will seek to mobilize God’s people to ‘deep, consistent, groaning prayers that never take no for an answer.’
By the way, happy new year.
** ““the false opinion of the motion of the Earth…”
"Shawna, are you helping the woman in this dressing room?" she asked. I could see her black boots below my door and I knew I was the only one in a dressing room at the time.
Maternal Health Accountability Act of 2011 (H.R.894)
And again, during the transitional period, the primary causes of deaths were not security forces nor white right-wing violence against blacks, but mainly due to "black-on-black necklace murders", tribal conflict between the ANC-IFP, bombs by the ANC and PAC's military wings in shopping centers, landmines on farm roads, etc.
Gradually add flour mixture, stirring by hand just until combined. Set aside.
Yesterday at the thrift store I watched a very young mother scold her very young child (about four) for spilling his crackly bag of red hot cheetohs all over the floor. He apologized and said it was "a accident" and she continued to scold as she swept the glaringly red snack food under the clothing rack with her right foot. I was flabbergasted. I probably shouldn't have been but I was. In my snoot, snoot, snooty head I glared and reprimanded. There were too many things I thought wrong with the whole scene and I thought what good is she teaching this child?
And writing? Novel #1 will be sent off to start its rounds in October(ish). I imagine it as a Gap Year for unpublished manuscripts. It will go out fresh faced and ready for adventure and return older, wiser and hopefully a little grubby but better for the experience. And Novel #2 is underway. I can't tell you how happy I am to be writing something new. And it's got nuns in it which means research. Now, I wonder if there is a nun museum...?
This is what your twenties are for — to feel and see as much as you can, to take advantage of not being tied down to anything and anyone and to go balls to the wall with everything that you do. You’re a raw nerve. You hate getting upset over little things, about being constantly unraveled by ignored text messages, parents, grades, and friends, but you have to remember something: you don’t know yourself entirely yet. Before the age of 20, you were mostly under your parents care, a reflection of what was going on around you. You didn’t have the option to make your own choices. You were merely living the life someone set out for you. Being in your twenties allows you to start carving out the life you want for yourself. Everything is on your terms now which seems daunting but is actually liberating. For the first time in your life you’re the boss.
A friend of mine recently told me “there aren’t thousands of fossils”. There are. Indeed there are many more than just thousands; one large natural history museum alone may hold several million. The point, perhaps, was that only a subsection of fossils can tell us anything about evolution but this is a misconception. Every fossil is evidence for evolution. ‘Missing link’ is a nonsense phrase loved in equal measure by creationists and the media; the term implies brokenness, which is great for arguing that evolution is not yet established and also great for raising the media potential of a fossil discovery. As with all anti-evolutionary ideas it stems from Darwin’s own critique of his theories which he explored honestly and humbly within his book from the first publication. When ‘The Origin of Species’ was published in 1859 there were no known fossils that could be described as intermediate between two major taxa, what Darwin called transitional varieties. Darwin thought this was due to the incomplete nature of the fossil record and speculated that in due course transitional forms would emerge; it took only two years.
A little blind girl just turned 5 this week. Since she cannot see she is having a hard time learning how to read (even Braille), she does not watch TV or even explore her world the same as you do. Her favorite comfort is a spoon. She likes the way it feels in her mouth and reminds her of her mother who feeds her and comforts her.
Have you ever fallen in love at first sight?
‘Whoever started this should be blacklisted.’
Philip Thomas, CEO of Cannes Lions, added, “Khai has been a big part of Cannes for a number of years now. Whether as a jury member, a speaker or simply picking up numerous Lions, his stature within the industry is undisputed. Chairing two juries is no easy task but Khai’s dedication and experience will be invaluable in both leading the juries and finding the winners. We are delighted to welcome him on board again.”
I'm a big fan of this pattern with its handy tubular frame, making fossicking in its depths much easier.
Our government likes to show it gives, but this time like many other times, it gives to the guy that do not deserves. Unless the government learns to wipe out those semi state enterprises bosses who does not perform, never tell the people about productivity, it do not hold water. Sigh!.
There must be some fine print in the Bible I've never read that means you only have to apply those values to the things you like.
The first room I entered knocked me out, wow! I love Durers paintings and here there were a few The Martyrdom of the Ten Thousand was my favorite. So much to see in one painting. The rest of the museum was equally brilliant. Of course The Tower of Babel by Brugel was a highlight, another stunning room. The other highlights for me were the paintings by Hans Memling, Rogier Van Der Weyden, Caravaggio, Lucas Cranach and Tiepolos “Saint Catherine of Siena”. If ever you make it to Vienna it is well worth the admission price.
I just consumed the ending and did not actually question any of it. Consumed it and then regretted it, like eating at McDonald’s. I immediately thought, yup, those smart Internet folk are right, that ending was bad. I wrote to my finacée after mentioning to her that it was with great regret that I have to side with the rabid fanboys on the Internet complaining to a company that they made a game and didn’t like the ending. I said that the game’s ending is not bad because of its sparsity, but because of it’s lack of loose end knots and big group hugs of WE DID IT! There was no weird bed scene with hobbits and dwarves smiling impishly at each other, there was no ship to the Grey Havens 45 minutes later, there was no abstracted crucifixion of the hero by the machines, no tears were shed, no one was slowly lowered into molten steel, there was no celebratory party where furry cute things used the helmets of your enemies as drums, Tyler Durden wasn’t unveiled, Marcus Brody definitely did not ride off into the impossibly beautiful sunset and most importantly there was no magical Deus Ex Machina. Not in as many words but I actually initially said that Mass Effect 3‘s ending was bad because it lacked any God from the Machine interventions, and I’m terribly ashamed at this.
Vinay: Legal studies. I have always wanted to become a lawyer…ever since seeing the movie, ”A Few Good Men”.
So, what IS "The Ash-Born Boy"?
He also says that studies have shown porn causes brain changes in adults and children, and that every family should be concerned about its harmful effects.
Sometimes realizing God’s plan for hope and a new future will lead you where you have never been before. You will not be walking in someone else’s footprints; you will be making your own. You may be leaving footprints where they may have never been seen before in new path blazing through the obstacle that is in front of you, as God destroys the enemy that is behind you. So go ahead and move forward in life knowing confidently that God has it all planned out for you if you will but trust Him. Follow God’s plan for your life, and trust His unfailing, forgiving love. In His plan, every pain, hurt, wound, and disappointment that you have experienced will find peace. If you will but trust His plan for your life, you will find the sense of wholeness and completion that you long for.
Which brings me to the subject of this post. Before the photo shoot, I dropped Katie off at the salon to get her hair done and a professional makeup job. While I waited for her outside, I saw a parade of beautiful women coming in and out of the salon. They were beautiful on the way in, and beautiful on the way out (which led me to question what the heck they were doing in there anyway). They just kept coming - blondes, brunettes, red-heds, one after another they came and went, all of them looking stunningly perfect.
Last year I ordered chocolate-covered matzoh from a vegan chocolate company we love. Sadly, we were unimpressed with the Passover treat. So this year I made Tom my own version of it. It really takes no time at all. Just melt the chocolate, dip the matzoh and let it harden in the fridge. Done.
We already have two places you can leave comments to win:
Responding to the needs of adult learners, Prindiville has spearheaded the development of new degree and certificate programs and led efforts to expand articulation agreements with various colleges and universities, allowing students greater ease in transferring WCTC credits toward two- and four- year degrees. An advocate for service-learning, Prindiville has advanced opportunities for WCTC students to integrate meaningful community service and civic responsibility with academic preparation. As a result of her initiatives, WCTC was acknowledged on the U.S. Presidential Higher Education Community Honor Roll for Service Learning in 2009 and 2012.
And it’s not like
Step 2: For the giraffe spots, start with a square in the middle of the nail (using the brush in the nail polish) then add squares around the middle one. Then using the eyeliner brush, drip it in the nail polish and use it to spread the squares out until they almost touch each other. Play around with it! The eyeliner brush helps you fine tune your spots!
The first problem arrived when I picked mom up at the airport and noticed the left front tire was slightly lower on air. So I decided to keep an eye on it. Two days later it looked like it was even lower, so we searched out a petrol station with a working air pressure thingy and found out there was hardly any air in it. The other tires were 34psi (or whatever it's called) and the said tire was only 12psi. I filled it up to 34 and retested the next day, and it was back down to 25psi. So off we went to find a place to fix it.
Charles Chandler of Norfolk indicated: “I am not sure what I am angrier about. This story, or the crowd of black teens who needlessly and thoughtlessly beat two white victims. Or am I just angry that this still occurs in the year 2012. Nearly fifty years after the marches and the speeches and the declaration of civil liberties for all people. Clearly we are nowhere near the dream Dr. King envisioned. I am angry. I am angry at the calloused cop who stated “this is what they do”. I am angry at the Pilot for hiding it under a bushel.”
Speaking of Messy Jessy, I’ve already asked her to be my maid of honor!! I’m pretty sure she’s going to rock at this – if it’s even possible, she’s more excited than I am about our wedding! She and my two sisters will stand up with me in a small wedding on an island in the Bahamas. Since she and my two sisters are both skinny bitches, I’ve placed them all on 4,000 calorie a day diets, which they are to follow up until our wedding day in September 2013. Sure, they’ll probably have heart problems, shortness of breath and need to have their blood pressure taken at the end of the aisle, but at least that ensures I’ll be the cutest, SKINNIEST girl up there!!! Actually Messy has already punched a hole right through that plan, so I’m going with plan B: actually losing weight myself instead of force-feeding my skinnier bridesmaids.
My almost-three-year-old hasn’t yet developed the logic to deal with fears. But I expect that she and her sister will one day simply grow out of the night light. It’ll probably be about the time they start to push me away and order me to drop them off around the corner from their school.
And there you have my first posting for the Gluten Free Ratio Rally. Huge thanks to Jenn from Jenn Cuisine for inviting me onboard, and thank you to Caroline* from The G-Spot Revolution for hosting this month's cookie challenge. And in closing, a list of all the cookie contributors and their creations for this month's Ratio Rally Challenge. Can you imagine if all these cookies were at a bake sale? Mind-boggling. :)
i hope to be visiting and commenting on blogs this week!!!! - THANK YOU for every one's comments!!! - i miss you guy's, life has had me on the MOVE these last few weeks, just trying to catch my breathe!
We also have one other prize on offer that will go to one of our new followers this month, all you need do to be in with a chance of winning is sign up, simple as that.
After the event, I had a chance to speak one-on-one with Ms. Roliardi, and a couple of the workers from the Riverview Center. In my chat with Ms. Roliardi, we touched on some of the earlier topics, and some more specific items, especially in regard to some of the legal wrangling involved. She said that in her experience judges are one of the overlooked obstacles, and they’re too quick to dismiss charges. Another problem is the issue of consent—that prosecutors are in the unenviable position of having to prove a negative: that consent did not happen. And then the inevitable debate of what constitutes consent. Also, any case involving children as victims or witnesses are, by nature, difficult to pursue.
It's actually brilliant. And the reason it's brilliant is because everybody says it isn't brilliant.
For Sri Lanka, dashing opener Tillakratne Dilshan has been in superb form, cracking two back-to-back hundreds before a blitzy 18-ball 41 at Cuttack. Dilshan’s opening partner Upul Tharanga and skipper Kumar Sangakkara are also among runs, though Mahela Jayawardene is going through a lean patch.
Yeah, so...life's been happening the last couple of weeks. Between wedding planning (we leave in 3 weeks!), houseguests last weekend, a trip to Staten Island last week, and trying to get a roof contract wrapped up, there's been little time to write.
Looking back on the 2010 awards (2009 is here), I think I can safely say I achieved my ambition for 2011: to travel. 12 countries and 4 of them new to me is a personal best. And the beer scene in Ireland has moved on quite a ways in the past year. I'm excited at the thought of similar progress over the next 12 months. Anyway, here's how it's all panned out:
Pattern mixing can be scary, especially if you're used to making sure everything matches.
cannibal corpse- Fort Worth, TX USA 03/08/92
I just learned how to make jam and kind of feel pretty awesome about it. (thanks to cindi lou)
While the badly needed rest for Sanchez is expected, don’t think her fans to be resting. The fans and supporters of Jessica continuously campaigning for the Fil-Am singer. Just last March 7, 2012 the San Diego radio station 93.3 had some of the fans, who call themselves “BluJay”s in the studio Wednesday looking to put together support for the hometown contestant. Radio personalities Frankie and Geena invited the fans up to talk about Jessica Sanchez and what can be done to support the hometown girl.
3.) You get to have cred! Like, look! I took something that could take about ten seconds with a can opener, and stretched it over 2 days!
What a fun day!!
But since the advent of computers, hot metal presses have not been used to publish material. So why do we still do it? Double-spaced text is easier to read. (Try it. Print out one of your typescripts in double-spaced format and then print out the same text in single spaced format. Which is easier on the eye?) This is why writing competitions ask for double-spaced text. It is far easier for the judge to read. I once had to judge a pile of 166 short stories (of up to 4,500 words each) and it's surprising how quickly the eyes tire.
Chinese agriculture was neither in a boom nor in decline in the eighteenth century. Robert Allen uses convincing data collecting methods and finds out that labor productivity in the Yangzi Delta was about 79% of that in England in 1800. England and Jiangnan went on divergent paths in the mid-eighteenth century, with sustained productivity growth in manufacturing and agriculture in England, and static or worsening productivity in Jiangnan.
some dessicated coconut, toasted until golden
As she watches the nothingness that is occurring on the other side of the glass and wishing that she was enjoying that nothingness instead of being caught up in all the crap that is currently going on in her life, the door to her room opens and closes. Figuring that the people who entered her room are a nurse and a deputy, Shannon doesn’t care to look over to confirm this. She just continues looking out her window, hoping that something of interest occurs in its limited frame, even if it’s just pareidolia she experiences while looking at a cloud.
RWI More Than Magic Finalist
Any who I'm currently living in jumpers thrown over a collared shirt.
In effect, the government either owns or guarantees half the outstanding residential mortgages in this country. According to data compiler CoreLogic Inc., 5.67 million home mortgages in the U.S. were either in the foreclosure process or delinquent last month, exposing our government to even more losses.
